Lieut.-Col. Josiali Harmar to Thomas Mifflin, President of Congress. 

New York, January 19th, 1784. 
Sir — I have the honor to inform your Excellency that I arrived here 
this day. I left Annapolis the morning of the 15th, in the stage. On 
my arrival in Baltimore, I hired a sleigh, which conveyed me that night as 
far as Leggett's. Here I found a stage. On the morning of the 16th I 
took passage in it, and that night gained the head of Elk. Fortunately 
I here met his Excellency the Minister of France, who delivered me his 
dispatches. On the morning of the 17th, before day, I left the head of 
Elk in the stage, and gained Philadelphia in the evening. I instantly 
Avaited upon the honorable Mr. Morris, and produced to him the act of 
Congress, directing him to supply me with cash to bear my necessary ex- 
penses. He gave me one hundred and three pounds fifteen shillings cash, 
and a credit upon Paris. I then waited upon his Excellency the Presi- 
dent of the State, and delivered him his letters. I engaged a sleigh to 
go on with me the next morning — lodged at your house that night — left 

(413) 



414 APPENDIX NO. I. 

the ladies, Mrs. Suckey and Miss Beccy well. Sarago awakened me before 
day on Sunday morning, the 18th, and the sleigh being at the door, I wag 
conveyed by fresh horses with great celerity that night as far as Newark, 
eighty-six miles. On the 19th, in the morning, the day being excessively 
stormy, I left Newark, and with great difficulty in the passage of the 
North river, arrived in New York that evening. I then instantly went 
on board the French packet, and was introduced to Monsieur D'Aboville, 
the captain, the Minister having given me a letter to him. I shall use 
every exertion at L'Orient to get forward to Paris and deliver the ratifi- 
cation of the treaty in time. 

I have the honor to be, with the greatest esteem and affection. 
Your Excellency's most obedient servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 

His Excellency, Thomas Mifflin, Esq., President of Congress, Annapolis. 



Same to same. 

Paris, April 8th, 1784. 
Sir — I had the honor of addressing your Excellency on the 21st of 
February last, the day we left Sandyhook. I now have the pleasure to 
inform you of my safe arrival at L'Orient on the 25th ult., after a rough 
and stormy passage of thirty-three days. When we were seventeen days 
out we were near Cape Finisterre, which gave us every reason to expect 
our voyage would be completed in twenty days ; but on the European 
coast, the strong eastwardly winds set in, which detained us a fortnight 
longer. Immediately upon my landing at L'Orient, I hired a voiture and 
went day and night by post — arrived at Paris on the 29th — delivered the 
dispatches Congress was pleased to intrust me with to his Excellency, 
Doctor Franklin, that evening, and took the necessary receipt for the 
same, agreeably to the private instructions received from your Excellency. 
In conversation the day before yesterday with Doctor Franklin, I informed 
him that I should send yovir Excellency advice of the time of my arrival and 
delivery of the public dispatches, and begged to know whether he thought 
any difficulties were likely to arise on account of the treaty not being ex- 
changed agreeably to the stipulated time. The doctor gave me for answer, 
that he had written some time since to Laurens on the subject, and de- 
sired him to inform Mr. Hartley (the British commissioner) that the rea- 
son of the treaty not having arrived, must be owing to the inclemency of 
the season in America; and that if it should be judged necessary by the 
court of Great Britain, he thought that Mr. Laurens would do well to 
enter into an agreement for an exten.=5ion of time. Mr. Hartley was ac- 



LETTERS. 415 

cordingly informed of the above circumstances by Mr. Laurens, an:I his 
reply to Mr. Laurens was, that the court were satisfied with the reasons 
advanced, and that an extension of time was unnecessary. I therefore 
have the satisfaction to inform your Excellency all is well. 

The Marquis de la Fayette intends sailing for America about the latter 
end of next month, and has very politely offered me a passage in the same 
vessel with him, which I shall embrace with pleasure. I had the honor 
of delivering your Excellency's letter to him ; he desires me to present 
you his particular compliments. 

For British politics, I beg leave to refer your Excellency to the inclosed 
papers, which the Marquis has been obliging enough to favor me with 
Mr. Pitt is prime minister, and Mr. Fox has gained the Westminster 
election. I have the honor to be, &c., 

Jos. IIarmar. 

P. S. — No intelligence as yet of the arrival of Lieut. Colonel Franks at 
London with the triplicate of the treaty. 



Same to same. 

London, May 5tli, 1784. 
Sir — Colonel Franks, whom I left in Paris, arrived about twelve days 
after me, and delivered his dispatches in London. The attention of the 
British nation seems to be at present principally engaged in the issue of 
the Westminister election. Your Excellency will be pleased to receive 
the inclosed papers. Fox and no Fox, is all the cry. 

In the letter which I had the honor of writing you from Paris, T in- 
formed your Excellency that Mr. Fox had gained his point ; but I was 
then mistaken ; however, it is now beyond a doubt that he will succeed. 
I shall return to France the 12th of this month, and expect the Marquis 
de la Fayette, whom I shall accompany. Will be ready to sail about the 
1st June. I have the honor to be, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 



Same to John Dichinson, Esq. 

Fort M'Intosh, January 15, 1785. 

Sir — A few days since the treaty commenced, and I believe will be 

satisfactorily concluded against the latter end of this mouth; although iha 

chiefs of the Wyandots, Chippewas, Delawares and Ottawas (which are 

the nations that are assembled here), in a speech which they delivered at 



416 



APPENDIX NO. I. 



the council-fire yesterday, held out an idea to the continental commission- 
ers, that they still looked upon the lands which the United States held by 
the treaty with Great Britain, as their own. But the commissioners have 
answered them in a high tone j the purport of which was, that as they had 
adhered during the war to the King of Great Britain, they were considered 
by us as a conquered people, and therefore had nothing to expect from the 
United States, but must depend altogether upon their lenity and generos- 
ity. This spirited answer, it is supposed, will have the desired effect. 

The State commissioners will not have the least difficulty in transacting 
their business, which lays with the Wyandot and Delaware nations. 
I have the honor, &c., 

Jos. Harmar, 
Lt.-Col. Gom'g. \st Am. RegH. 
His Excellency John Dickinson, Esq., President the Honorable the Supreme Execu- 
tive Council. 



Same to John Armstrong, Secretary to Council, Philadelplda. 

Fort M'Intosh, May 24, 1785. 
Sir — Inclosed be pleased to find a list of the officers who are willing to 
continue upon the present establishment. 

Names and rank of the officers of the Pennsylvania line, who are at present 
in the service of the United States, and are willing to remain upon the 
establishment, agreeably to the Act of Congress of the 7th April, 1785. 

DATES OF APPOINTMENT. 

12th August, 1784. 
12th August, 1784. 
12th August, 1784. 
12th August, 1784. 
12th August, 1784. 
12th August, 1784. 
12th August, 1784. 
12th /Vugust, 1784. 
12th August, 1784. 
12th iVugust, 1784. 
12th August, 1784. 
21st October, 1784. 
12th August, 1784. 
12th August, 1784. 



NAMES. 


KANK. 


Josiah Harmar, 


Lieut.-Colonel, 


Walter Finney, 


Captain, 


David Ziegler, 


Captain, 


William M'Curdy, 


Captain, 


Thomas Douglas, 


Captain, 


Joseph Aston, 


Lieutenant, 


Stewart Herbert, 


Lieutenant, 


Ercureus Beatty, 


Lieutenant, 


Thomas Doyle, 


Lieutenant, 


John Armstrong, 


Ensign, 


Ebenezer Denny, 


Ensign, 


Nathan M'Dowell, 


Ensign, 


John M'Dowell, 


Surgeon, 


Richard Allison, 


:Mate, 


Your most obedient 


and very humble 



servant. 



Jos. Harmar. 



LETTERS. 417 

Same to General Knox. 

Fort M'Intosh, June 1, 1785. 
Sir — The Wyandot and Delaware nations have brought in their pris- 
oners (fifteen in number), agreeably to the treaty, and the hostages left in 
my possession are now dismissed. These nations are friendly. The 
Shawanees make great professions of peace. The Cherokces are hostile, 
and have killed and scalped seven people near the mouth of the Scioto, 
about three hundred and seventy miles from hence. 

Speeches have been continually sending by the British, from Detroit to 
the Indians, since the treaty, and I have good intelligence that several 
traders have been amongst them, using all means to make them entertain 
a bad opinion of the Americans. One Simon Girty, I am informed, bus 
been at Sandusky for that purpose. 

Your most obedient servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 



Same to Colonel Francis Johnston. 

Fort M'Intosh, June 21, 1785. 

Dear Johnston — I am hourly expecting the arrival of the commis- 
sioners, as I understand a treaty is to be held at Post St. Vincent. 

Between you and me, my dear Johnston, vain and ineffectual will all 
treaties be, until we take possession of the posts. One treaty held at De- 
troit would give dignity and consequence to the United States, and answer 
every purpose. 

The British have been sending speeches among the Indians, continually, 
since the treaty was held at this place, the purport of which, you may be 
assured, was for no good. The first grand object, therefore (in my hum- 
ble opinion), would be to dispossess them, and then we shall have the 
Indians friendly to our interest. The nations down the river have killed 
and scalped several adventurers who have settled on their lands. 

I wish you were here to view the beauties of Fort M'Intosh. What think 
you of pike of 25 lbs. ; perch of 15 to 20 lbs. ; cat-fish of 40 lbs. ; bass, 
pickerel, sturgeon, &c., &c. ? You would certainly enjoy yourself It is 
very fortunate there is such abundance of fish, as the contractor for this 
place, some time past, has failed in his supplies of beef This would be a 
, glorious season for Colonel Wood, or any extravagant lover of strawberries ; 
the earth is most luxuriantly covered with them — we have them in such 
plenty that I am almost surfeited with them ; the addition of fine rich 
cream is not lacking. 

Jos. Harmar. 

27 



418 APPENDIX NO. I. 

Sa7ne to General 3fifflin. 

Fort M'Lntosh, June 25, 1785. 

Dear General — I am honored -witli jour letter of the 7th May last, 
sent me by Major Prevost, of Pittsburgh. The pitiful reduction of the 
officers' pay, I am at a loss to account for. 

The commissioners are daily expected for the treaty on the Wabash. 
In confidence, my dear General, I'll assure you, in my opinion, all these 
treaties will be ineffectual. Possessing the British posts ought to be the 
first grand object, then a treaty at Detroit would answer all purposes. 
The United States will never have either dignity or consequence among 
the Indians, until this is effected. 

The ofiicial letter, inclosing you Dr. Franklin's receipt for the delivery 
of the trenty, &c., I hope you have received. 

P. S. — The Indians down the river, viz., the Shawanecs, Miamis, Chero- 
kecs and Kickapoos, have killed and scalped several adventurers — settlers 
on their lands. 



Sa77ie to General Knox. 

FoKT M'Intosh, July 1, 1785. 
Sir — The cockade we wear is the union (black and white.) Perhaps 
it will be necessary to have a national one ; if so, be pleased to send me 
your directions about the color. And if you should approve of a national 
march (without copying French or British), I should be glad to be in- 
structed. 



Same to same. 

Fort M'Intosh, July 16th, 1785. 

Sir — On the 11th instant, I was informed that three chiefs (and twen- 
ty-five Indians) of the Six Nations had arrived at Fort Pitt, and wished 
very much to speak with the commanding officer. Agreeably to their de- 
sire, I rode up to Pittsburgh and met them in council ; when to my great 
surprise the Cornplanter, the principal chief, had the original articles of 
the treaty which was concluded with them at Fort Stanwix, along with 
him^ and toward the close of the speech, said they were burthensome, 
and wished to deliver them up. I have the honor to inclose to you their 
speech and my answer to it. 

It is reported that a Mr. Brant has lately arrived from London, who 
(with the commanding officer of the British in that quarter) has informed 
the Six Nations that their lands were never ceded to the Americans by 



LETTERS. 419 

the King of Great Britain. In consequence of ^hich, these chiefs com- 
plain of being accused by their nations of treachery, and say they are in 
danger of their own people. 

They have left Fort Pitt highly satisfied to appearance with the answer 
to their speech ; but as long as the British keep possession of the posts, it 
is very evident that all treaties held by us with the Indians, will have 
but little weight with them. 

Your most obedient servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 

The Honorable Major-General Knox, Secretary at "War, New York. 



Same to Hon. Artlmr Lee. 

Philadelphia, December 28, 1785. 
Dear Sir — The bearer. Doctor Wilkins, has some thoughts of contract- 
ing to supply the regiment with rations. From the recommendation of 
General Irvine of Carlisle, who offers to be his security for the perform- 
ance of his engagements, I am induced to believe that he will use every 
exertion to please both ofl&cers and men. If, therefore, the terms which 
he may give in should be lower or as low as other applicants, I would 
beg leave to recommend him to your notice. 



Same to General Knox. 

Philadelphia, May 7th, 1786. 
I have just received the inclosed letters from Captain Finney at the 
Miami. The intelligence is truly alarming, and notwithstanding the fair 
reports of the commissioners concerning the peaceable disposition of the 
Indians, I am well convinced all their treaties are farcical, as long as the 
British possess the posts. The party of Indians alluded to in this letter 
as a reconnoitering party from Detroit, were discovered by Captain Strong 
near the garrison at M'Intosh. Upon a party being sent out, they fled, 
being about twenty in number. Duncan and Wilson's reports I have not 
inclosed, as they contain some reflections on General Butler, particularly 
mentioning his small influence among the different tribes of Indians. If 
you wish to see them, I shall inclose them per nest opportunity. 



Same to General Knox. 

Fort Pitt, July 3, 1786. 
Sir — One John Bull (called by the Indians Shcbo,) informs me that 



420 APPEIfDIX NO. I. 

he left Detroit on the 29th April, in company with one hundred Mora- 
vian Indians, men, women and children, and are at present about four 
miles from Cuyahoga — that they have crossed the lake with the intention 
to settle near their old towns on the Muskingum, where a party of the 
Indians were formerly massacred ; but as they are too late in the season 
for planting, their intention is to remain and hunt near Cuyahoga until 
fall. 

He further informs me, that on the 7th ultimo Commodore Grant, with 
Captain M'Kee, Simon Girty and Matthew Elliott, with forty Indians, 
among whom were the Half-King, Baubee, Koon and Gusheways, a chief 
of the Ottawas and Chippewas, sailed from the mouth of Sandusky river 
for Canada. They gave out that they were going as far as Quebec, with 
a design to purchase the lands on the north side of the lake from the In- 
dians, but it was generally supposed they were going no farther than 
Niagara to a treaty which Sir John Johnson (who was there) had in- 
vited them and the Six Nations to. 

These Moravian Indians (among whom Bull resides), by what I can 
learn, have ever been friendly to the United States. 



Saine to Captain Finnei/, commanding officer of the Miavii. 

Fort Hahmab, at the mouth of the Muskingum, "l 
July 27, 1786. J 
Sir — I intend to appoint Mr. Denny Adjutant to the regiment, for 
which purpose he must repair here as soon as possible. 

Jos. Harmar. 



Same to General Knox, 

Fort Harmar, August 10, 1786. 
Sir — Since I had the honor of addressing you on the 4th instant. En- 
sign Denny has arrived from the Miami, and brings intelligence that an 
expedition is forming under the command of General Clark, and author- 
ized by the State of Virginia, to attack the Indians. 



Extract from the Order Book of Lieut.-Col. Commit. Jbsiah Harmar. 

GARRISON ORDERS. 

Fort Harmak, at the mouth of the Muskingum, I 
October 8, 1786. J 
Ensign Dennj'' is appointed Adjutant of the regiment, and is accord 
iugly to be obeyed and respected. 



LETTERS. 421 

Sa7nc to TJiomas Mifflin, Speaker of the House of Assemhly, Penmyloania. 

Fort Pitt, March 17, 1787. 

The Muskingum river is about one hundred and eighty miles distant 
from here, at the mouth of which the fort stands. I have often wished 
during the hunting season (viz., the months of November and Decem- 
ber), for the honor of your company at my post. Venison, bear, turkey, 
geese, ducks, &c., &c. You should have regaled upon the greatest abun- 
dance. 

. Bo pleased to view the inclosed plan of the remains of some ancient 
works on the Muskingum, taken by a captain of mine, with his expla- 
nations. 

Various are the conjectures concerning these fortifications. From their 
regularity I conceive them to be the works of some civilized people. Who 
they were, I know not. Certain it is, the present race of savages are 
strangers to any thing of the kind. 



Same to Major Hamframck. 

Fort Harmab, April 7, 1787 
Sir — Permit me to congratulate you upon your promotion. I observe 
that the council of appointment have directed that you take rank from 
the 21st October, 1786. Lieut. Bradford is captain of artillery; Lieut. 
Smith, a captain of infantry ; Ensign Peters, a lieutenant of infantry ; 
Ensign Schuyler, lieutenant of artillery, and Matthew Ernest, lieutenant 
of infantry ; the latter I conceive to be a new appointment. 



Same to General Knox, Secretary at War. 

Fort Harmar, May 14, 1787. 

During my short stay at the Falls, I endeavored to make myself ac- 
quainted with the politics of the country, and to gain as perfect a know- 
ledge as I possibly could, of what was going forward amongst the inhab- 
itants of Kentucky. The free navigation of the Mississippi is the general 
subject of discourse amongst them. The inhabitants to the westward of 
the Allegheny mountains are unanimously opposed to its being closed ; 
if such a measure should take place they will look upon it as the greatest 
grievance, as the prosperity of the western world depends entirely upon 
this outlet. 

Kentucky at present, by the returns of their county lieutenants, musters 
five thousand fighting men. You will please to judge what a flourishing 



422 APPENDIX NO. I. 

country this must be in tlie course of a few years, from the number of 
emigrants to it. Curiosity prompted me to order the officer of the day 
(Lieut. Denny) to take an account of the number of the boats, &c., which 
passed this garrison from the 10th of October, 1786, until the 12th of 
May, 1787 : one hundred and seventy-seven boats, two thousand six hun- 
dred and eighty-nine souls, thirteen hundred and thirty-three horses, 
seven hundred and sixty-six cattle, and one hundred and two wagons, have 
passed Muskingum, bound for Limestone and the Rapids. If Congress 
should be of opinion that it will be expedient to shut the navigation, I 
think a respectable post at the mouth of the Ohio, or the Wabash, will 
be necessary ; otherwise, from all appearances, the people will become so 
strong, in the course of a little time, as to force a trade, at all events. 



Same to same. 

Camp at Vinceknes, Augiast 7, 1787. 

Post Vincennes is a very considerable village, situate upon the Wabash, 
about one hundred and twenty miles from its mouth. It contains nearly 
four hundred houses (log and bark), out-houses, barns, &c. The number 
of inhabitants about nine hundred (souls) French, and about four hun- 
dred (souls) Americans. Monsieur Vincennes, the French officer from 
whom it derives its name, I am informed, was here and commenced the 
settlement sixty years ago. 

I have the honor to acknowledge the receipt of your letter of 1st June, 
inclosing the contract of Mr. O'Hara with the Board of Treasury for the 
supply of the troops, &c. 



Same to same. 

Kaskaskia, November 24, 1787. 

Sir — I marched on the 9th August from the post (Vincennes), with a 
subaltern, Ensign M'Dowell, and thirty men, through the prairies, and 
arrived at Kaskaskia on the IGth of the same month. Our march was 
very fatiguing, as the weather was excessively warm, and water very bad 
and scarce on the route. The distance is about one hundred and sixty 
miles J the French call it eighty leagues. I was accompanied by two In- 
dians (Pachan, a Miami chief, and his comrade), who hunted and sup- 
plied the party with meat (bullalo and deer), both on the march and 
upon our return. 

The prairies are very extensive, natural meadows, covered with long 
grass; one in particular, which we crossed, was eight leagues in breadth. 
They run, in general, from north to south, and like the ocean^ as far as 



LETTEES 



423 



tlie eye can see, tlie view is terminated by the horizon. Here and there 
a copse of wood is interspersed. They are free from brush and under- 
wood, and not the least vestige of their ever having been cultivated. The 
country is excellent for grazing, and abounds in buffalo, deer, bear, &c. 
It is a matter of speculation to account for the formation of the prairies. 
The western side of the Wabash is overflown in the spring, for several 

miles. 

On the 17th, I was visited by the magistrate and principal inhabitants 
of Kaskaskia, welcoming us upon our arrival. Baptiste De Coigne, the 
chief of the Kaskaskia Indians, paid me a visit in the afternoon, and de- 
livered me a speech expressive of the greatest friendship for the United 
States ; and at the same time presented me with one of the calumets, or 
pipes of peace, which is now sent on. Some of the Peoria Indians like- 
wise visited me. The Kaskaskias, Peorias, Cahokia and Mitchi tribes 
compose the Illinois Indians. They are almost extinct at present, not 
exceeding forty or fifty, total. 

Kaskaskia is a handsome little village, situate on a river of the same 
name, which empties into the Mississippi at two leagues distant from it. 
It is one hundred and five miles from the mouth of the Ohio ; the situa- 
tion low and unhealthy, and subject to inundation. The inhabitants are 
French, and much of the same class as those at Post Vincennes ; their 
number is one hundred and ninety-one, old men and young. Having but 
very little time to spare, I left Lieutenant M'Dowell with the party at Kas- 
kaskia, and on the 18th set out, accompanied by Mr. Tardiveau and the 
gentlemen of the village, for Cahokia. We gained Prairie du Rocher, a 
small village five French leagues distant from Kaskaskia, where we halted 

for the night. 

On the 19th we passed through St. Philip, a trifling village three 
leagues distant from Prairie du Rocher, and dined at La Bellefontaine, six 
leagues farther. La Bellefontaine is a small stockade, inhabited alto- 
gether by Americans, who have seated themselves there without authority. 
It is a beautiful situation, fine fertile land, no taxation; and the inhabitants 
have abundance to live upon. They were exceedingly alarmed when I 
informed them of their precarious state respecting a title to their posses- 
sions, and have now sent on a petition to Congress by Mr. Tardiveau. On 
the same day we passed another small stockade, called Grand Ruisseau, 
inhabited by the same sort of Americans as those at La Bellefontaine, and 
arrived at Cahokia that evening. Cahokia is a village nearly of the size 
as that of Kaskaskia, and inhabited by the same kind of people; their 
number two hundred and thirty-nine, old men and young. I was re- 
ceived with the greatest hospitalitp by the inhabitants. There was a de- 



424 APPENDIX NO. I. 

cent submission and respect in their behavior. Cahokia is distant from 
Kaskaskia twenty-two French leagues, which is about fifty miles. 

On the 21st, in consequence of an invitation from Monsieur Cruzat, 
the Spanish commandant at St. Louis, we crossed the Mississippi, and 
were very politely entertained by him. After dinner, we returned to 
Cahokia. 

St. Louis (nicknamed Pancour) is much the handsomest and genteelest 
village I have seen on the Mississippi. It is about four miles distant 
from Cahokia, and five leagues above it the river Missouri unites with thf 
^Mississippi. The inhabitants are of the same sort as before described, 
excepting that they are more wealthy. About twenty regular Spanish 
troops are stationed here. 

Exclusive of the intruders already described, there are about thirty 
more Americans settled on the rich fertile bottoms of the Mississippi, who 
arc likewise petitioning by this conveyance. 

On the 23d, I passed by the ruins of Fort Chartres, which is one league 
above the Prairie du Rocher, and situate on the Mississippi. It was built 
of stone, and must have been a considerable fortification formerly, but the 
post next the river has been carried away by the floods, and it is of no 
consequence at present. I staid about a quarter of an hour, but had not 
time to view it minutely, as it was all a thicket within. Several iron 
pieces of cannon are here at present, and also at the diS"erent villages. 
This evening I returned to Kaskaskia. 

On the 24th, Monsieur Peruse, the Spanish commandant at St. Gene- 
vieve, sent me an invitation to pay him a visit. We crossed the Missis- 
sippi accordingly ; were politely entertained, and after dinner returned to 
Kaskaskia. 

St. Genevieve (nicknamed Misere) is a village much inferior in every 
respect to St. Louis ; it is about four miles (including the passage of the 
Mississippi,) from Kaskaskia. About eight or ten regular Spanish troops 
are stationed here. 

We arrived, on the 7th of October, at the rapids of the Ohio. The 
distance from Post Vincennes is about one hundred and thirty miles. Wo 
saw no Indians nor signs of Indians. We had an action with five buflFalo, 
who would have run through the column had they not been prevented by 
the men facing and firing a volley at them. They killed three of them. 

I am happy to hear of General St. Clair's appointment as Governor of 
tlie Yv''estern Territory, as it will add to the dignity of Congress. 



LETTERS. 425 

Same to General St. Clair. 

Fort IIarmar, November 25th, 1787. 
My dear General — I am happy, very happy, to hear by Captain 
Beatty of your appointment to the government of the Western Territory. 
Permit me sincerely to congratulate you upon it. 

Congress have been pleased to honor me with a brevet commission of 
Brigadier-General. I should be justly accused of ingratitude was I not 
to thank my old friend for his friendship and influence upon this occasion. 
I shall ever hold them in most grateful remembrance. 

Mrs. Harmar sends her kind compliments to you. Major Duncan left 
here yesterday for the Falls. 

I have the honor to be, my dear General, 

Your obliged friend and humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 

His Excellency Arthur St. Clair, Esq., Presiclent of Congress. 



Same to Major W//Ui/s, commanding at the Rapids of the Ohio. 

Fort Haemae, December 6, 1787. 
Dear IMajor — General Knox has written to me, that there are some 
apprehensions that Brant, with a number of confederated Indians, may 
be hostile. It will therefore be expedient that each post should be upon 
its guard. You will please to inform Major Hamtramck of it. 
Yours, sincerely, 

Jos. Harmar. 

P. S. — You will perceive by the inclosed paper the inflammatory letter 
written by Captain Sullivan to the Spanish Minister. If he should set 
his foot on the western territory, I have orders to seize and confine him. 



Same to General Knox. 

Fort Harmar, December 9, 1787. 
I have continued to order the ofiicer of the day to take an account of 
the people emigrating down the river. From the 1st of June to this day 
there passed this garrison, bound for Kentucky, 146 boats, 3,196 souls, 
1,371 horses, 165 wagons, 191 cattle, 245 sheep, and 24 hogs. 



Same to Captain Heart, commanding offi.ccr at Venango. 

FouT IIarmar, December 19, 1787. 
5lR — Your letters of the 12th and 25th June inform me of the peace- 



426 APPENDIX NO. I. 

able disposition of the Indians at that period ; but my latest letters from 
the War Office inform me, that there is great reason to suppose that the 
Indians Tvill confederate under Brant, and that hostilities will commence 
on their part. 

General St. Clair is appointed Grovernor of the Western Territory, and is 
to hold a grand treaty with them sometime nest spring. In the mean- 
time the utmost precaution is necessary on the part of the officers com- 
manding at the diflfereut posts in order to guard against surprises. 

You wish a name for your fortress. As it is in the State of Pennsyl- 
vani, let it be named Fort Franklin. 



Same to General Knox. 

FoKT Habmab, January 10, 1788. 

On the 6th of last month I wrote to Major Wyllys at the Rapids of 
the Ohio, and inclosed him a copy of the inflammatory letter written by 
Mr. Sullivan to his Excellency the Spanish Minister, and informed him, 
that if the said Sullivan should be found in the federal territory, I had 
orders to seize and confine him. 

It is the universal sentiment of the inhabitants westward of the Alle- 
gheny mountains, that they ought to enjoy the free navigation of the 
Mississippi, but I very much question whether the Kentucky, Cumber- 
land people, and those below, will have the audacity to attempt to seize 
upon the Natchez and New Orleans. Such an enterprise would certainly 
be a disgrace to the United States. I know of no cannon and the neces- 
sary apparatus which they have in their possession to carry on such an 
expedition. I shall transmit the duplicate of your letter of the 14th 
November and a copy of Sullivan's * letter to Major Brown and to Major 
Wyllys (as soon as the weather permits), with strict orders to watch 
closely and know the designs of those fellows down the river. I shall 
likewise give him directions to send an officer and two or three confiden- 
tial persons to Franklin and Kentucky under pretense of exploring the 
country, in order that we may be made acquainted with their intended 
manoeuvres. It appears to me that this matter will not be so serious as is 
imagined, but rather an evidence of the mutinous disposition of Sullivan 
and an insignificant banditti. Sullivan was the principal ringleader in 
the mutiny of the Pennsylvania line during the late war, and it is high 
time to put an end to his career. If he can be apprehended in Franklin, 

* Captain Sullivan, furmerly in Moylan's dragoons. 



LETTEES. 427 

or out of the federal territory, I sliould suppose myself justifiable in giv- 
ing orders for that purpose. 

We have had a remarkable spell of hard weather here ever since Christ- 
mas. The thermometer has been sixteen degrees below the zero point. 
The river is now fast bound with ice. As soon as the weather will permit, I 
shall send Major Wyllys the necessary orders respecting Sullivan and his 
adherents. If from the intellignce which I have given you respecting the 
inundation of the lands at the mouth of the Ohio, it should be judged 
advisable to fix upon some other tract of country to satisfy the claims of 
the late army, wherever Congress may be pleased to pitch upon said tract, 
I shall (agreeably to your directions) station an adequate body of troops in 
the vicinity thereof, in order that the surveyors may be pi-otected in the 
execution of their business. I beg leave to observe that Fort M'Intosh 
is by no means tenable. The small party stationed there at present I pro- 
pose to order to Fort Pitt, to receive stores, clothing, &c., and that the offi- 
cer commanding there may forward them, also, any dispatches which may 
arrive from the War Office. It should have been evacuated last spring, 
but for the orders received from you countermanding the same. I shall 
direct Major Doughty to proceed there with a party early in the spring, 
and to dismantle it. The fort is built of hewn timber; it will be easy to 
raft it to this post, where it will be of service. If a communication should 
be wanting to Lake Erie, a block-house for the reception of stores can in- 
stantly be built near the Big Beaver. 

Agreeably to your directions I have sent orders to the officers command- 
ing at the several posts, to put the troops perfectly upon their guard, in 
order to avoid surprise, as from the intelligcuce you have transmitted me, 
there may be a probability of the Indians confederating under Brant, and 
committing hostilities. I am in hopes the general treaty, which the Gov- 
ernor of the Western Territory means to hold in the spring, will pacify the 
savages and settle all differences. Respecting the land reserved to satisfy 
the claims of the late army, to the best of my knowledge, the million of 
acres which is to be bounded south by the Ohio Company purchase, will 
be found to be excellent land, especially if it should take the land on the 
Muskingum and its branches, which I am led to imagine will be the case. 
From all accounts the Muskingum river inclines more to the eastward 
than is laid down in Captain Hutchins' map ; if so, the tract reserved for 
the late army will be very valuable. The commercial situation of the 
land at the mouth of the Ohio, is fine indeed. It is a great misfortune 
that it is so subject to inundation. I beg leave to refer you to Mr. Tar- 
diveau for more particular intelligence on this subject. It is my opinion 
that a million of acres adjoining the other million on the Muskingum, 



428 APPENDIX NO. I. 

•would take in excellent land, and compreliend a very valuable tract of 
country. 

I liave the honor to be, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 
The Honorable Major-General Kxox, Secretary at War. 



From same to Dr. Wistar. 
Fort Habmar, at the Mouth of the Muskingum, Jan. 21, 1788. 
Dear Sir — I have been favored with your friendly letter of the 12th 
of September last. Some of the large bones which you request to be pro- 
cured, I believe are yet to be found at the Big Bone Lick, about thirty-five 
miles below the Great Miami river. I am very sorry indeed that your 
letter did not reach me whilst at the Rapids of the Ohio. In November 
last I came up the river with the two companies, and had your letter been 
received in time I should have made a point of halting at the Lick, which 
is only two miles from the Ohio, and have searched for the bones, and if 
any were still remaining, should with great pleasure have forwarded them 
to Fort Pitt and from thence to Philadelphia. We have had remarkable 
hard weather at this post since the new year set in. I shall make the 
necessary inquiry nest spring or summer, and if there is a possibility of 
procuring these bones, they shall be sent on for your friend in London, 
agreeably to your wish. Permit me to return you my most grateful ac- 
knowledgments for the friendship and civilities experienced from you 
when I had the pleasure of seeing you in London. I am extremely 
obliged to you for the European news which you have been pleased to 
transmit me. 

Believe me to be, dear sir, with great esteem, 
Yours sincerely, 

Jos. Harmar. 
Doctor Caspar Wistar, Jr., at Philadelphia. 



Same to Lieutenant Ernest. 

Fort Harmar, January 22, 1788. 
Sir — I have the pleasure to acknowledge the receipt of your letter of 
the 2d ultimo, by John Siddon, who was taken prisoner on the Wabash last 
summer. You inform that he was under obligation to pay the Moravian 
Indian who brought him into Fort Pitt, fifteen dollars, a shirt, a blanket 
and stroud ; and that you had sent the Indian home with a promise of 
something being obtained for him, whenever the matter was represented 



LETTERS. 429 

to me. As yet the soldier has not been mustered, but the paymaster shall 
be made acquainted with the circumstances, in order that when a settle- 
ment is made, the Indian may be satisfied. I am much obliged to you for 
the Pittsburgh newspapers which you were pleased to send on, and am, 
with esteem. 

Your humble servant, 



Harmar. 



Lieutenant Ernest, commauding officer at Fort Pitt 



Same to Lieutenant Ford. 

Fort Harmar, January 29, 1788. 
Dear Sir — Early in the spring I expect Fort M'Intosh will be evacua- 
ted. You will be ordered with your party to Fort Pitt, to take command 
there. When the evacuation takes place I shall give you particular orders 
on the subject. The Killikenick which you were kind enough to send me, 
was very acceptable. 

I am, dear sir, your humble servant. 

Jos. Harmar. 

Lieutenant Ford, commanding officer at Fort M'Intosh. 



Same to General Knox. 

Fort Harmar, March 9, 1788. 
Sir — Mr. David Zeisberger, Missionary of the Moravian Indians, has 
written to me requesting an exchange of the corn at M'Intosh for an 
equivalent in powder, linen, &c., which request I shall grant, as we are in 
want of the corn for the public horses. The distance those Indians are 
from M'Intosh, prevents their bringing it from thence. On the 14th ul- 
timo I received a message from Captain Pipe, the chief of the Delawares, 
who was hunting about fifty miles from hence, up the Muskingum, with 
thirty or forty of his nation. I answered his message, and on the 28th 
detached Ensign M'Dowell, with a party of a sergeant and fifteen privates, 
to view his situation, and sent him a message and a string of wampum — 
the messages are inclosed. On the 5th instant Ensign M'Dowell, with 
his party, returned, after having been treated with the utmost friendship 
and hospitality by the Indians at their hunting encampment. Yesterday 
old Captain Pipe, with seven of his young men, arrived at the garrison, 
and are now with me. Their object is to dispose of their skins to tho 



430 APPENDIX NO. I. 

contractor. He is a manly old fellow, and much more of a gentleman 
than the generality of these frontier people. 

I have the honor to he, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

The Honorable Major-General Knox, Secretary at War. 



Same to same. 

Fort Pitt, April 26, 1788. 
Sir — I am now upon my tour to Venango, and shall ascend the Alle- 
gheny to-morrow, in order to visit Captain Heart's post. I left Mus- 
kingum on the 6th instant, and on the 7th met General Putnam and part 
of the Ohio Company. Be assured, sir, that every assistance and protec- 
tion that is in our power, shall be rendered to this company. T make not 
the least doubt but a flourishing settlement will soon take place, as they 
are industrious, and quite a different set of people from these frontier men. 
I waited with great impatience for the arrival of Greneral Putnam, and it 
would have afforded me peculiar pleasure to have been personally present 
with him, but Major Doughty, who commands during my absence, will 
(agreeably to your letter of instructions) give them every necessary assist- 
ance. Nicholson, the interpreter and messenger, who resides at this place, 
returned from Sandusky on the 17th instant. His intelligence is that the 
Indians will be late in assembling to the treaty, and that it is their deter- 
mination to insist peremptorily on the Ohio river as the boundary. I do 
not think that full faith and credit is to be given to his intelligence. Be 
pleased to receive the inclosed monthly return of the regiment, dated the 
1st instant ; also a profile of north view of Captain Heart's works. I have 
directed Captain Heart to make out a map of the country from Yenango 
to Lake Erie, which I shall shortly have the honor of transmitting to you, 
I have the honor, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 



Same to Captain Heart. 

Fort Pitt, May 20, 1788. 
giR — By Sergeant Huntley I had the pleasure of receiving your letter 
and the map inscribed to the Secretary at War, which shall be forwarded 
to him. The bearer, Captain Beatty, now visits your post in order to pay 
the men under your immediate command. On his return you will please 
transmit me all the Indian intelligence which you can collect, as we do not 
know what the result of this grand treaty may be. I cannot too strongly 



LETTERS. 431 

impress upon you the necessity of the utmost vigilance in order to guard 
against surprise. You are out of all manner of support, and your depend- 
ence must be entirely upon yourself. The cranberries were very accept- 
able ; I am much obliged to you for them. Be pleased to present my 
compliments to Lieutenant Frothingham. 

I am, sir, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

Captain Heart, commanding officer at Fort Franklin. 

P. S. — Inclosed I send you the plats of my donation lands, likewise 
a plat of Captain Irwin's land, which I wish you to endeavor to find out 
and let me know the quality. 



Same to Doctor M' Dowell. 

Fort Pitt, May 21, 1788. 
Dear Sir — I have received your letter of the 20th of May, inclosing 
your commission and a letter for Captain Beatty. He left this place yes- 
terday for Venango, but will be here again next Sunday ; your letter shall 
be delivered to him. Be assured, sir, that I wish you all possible happi- 
ness a civil life can afford, and am, 

Your very humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 
Doctor John M'Dowell. 



Same to Dr, Wistar. 

Fort Harmar, June 9, 1788. 
Dear Sir — The bearer. Captain Armstrong, will deliver to you several 
bones of the huge, unknown animal, with an explanation of them. I am 
very sorry that it was out of the power of the ofiicer to procure some thigh 
bones, but I shall endeavor, at some future period, to send you them. 
I am, my dear sir, with great esteem and regard. 

Your very humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 
Doctor Caspar Wistar, Jr., Philadelphia. 



Same to General M>ffi.ln. 

FouT Harmar, June 9, 1788. 
My dear General — Your very agreeable letter of the 9th of May, 
was handed to me by Colonel Olney. Ensign Spear, on his return from 



432 APPENDIX NO. I. 

Post Yincennes, was fired upon by some vagabond Wabash Indians. He 
lost only two men. Mr. Melcher was on board the boat. The fire was 
returned from the troops ; they fired two rounds instantly, but the savages 
have great advantage over boats ascending the river. I sincerely hope 
that the new government will shortly be adopted, and that the next treaty 
(provided the present intended one has not the desired efi"ect,) may be 
held with the savages with fifteen hundred or two thousand troops. Mr. 
Melcher brought with him from Post Yincennes a Piankeshaw bow and 
quiver of arrows, also a Piankeshaw pipe, which he begged me to present 
to you. The bearer, Captain Armstrong, takes with him a grinder of the 
huge unknown beast, supposed by some to be the elephant. Mr. JeflFerson 
in his Notes calls it the mammoth ; likewise a petrifaction of the honey 
comb, or wasp's nest, I know not which. These are the only curiosities 
which I can at present ofier to you. Captain Armstrong will deliver you 
two venison hams and some pecan nuts, the produce of the Wabash, 
which I beg you to accept. My best wishes attend Mrs. Mifilin and your 
worthy family. 

I have the honor to be, my dear General, 

Your obliged friend and humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 



Same to Mr. Ross. 

Fort Harmae, June 14, 1788. 
Dear Sir — I had the pleasure of receiving your letter of the 5th of 
June, relative to one Jacob Countz, a Dutchman, who, you inform me, 
had deserted your part of the country with a view of defrauding his cred- 
itors. The fellow resides on the island a little above the garrison. In- 
stantly upon the receipt of your letter I sent a file of men for him and 
brought him to the garrison. In presence of Mr. Duncan, he has promised 
to be honest and pay his just debts. Captain Beatty is now paying the 
troops ; it is more than probable that this Countz will receive some money. 
I shall be happy to have it in my power to make him do justice to his 
creditors. 

I am, dear sir, with esteem, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

James Ross, Esq., at Pittsburgh. 



Same to General Knox. 

Fort Harmar, June 14, 1788. 
Respecting the dispute of rank between Captains Ziegler and Ferguson, 
Major Doughty and myself are both clearly and decidedly of opinion that 



LETTERS. 433 

Captain Ferguson is the senior officer. The case of Ensign Denny and 
Ensign Spear was exactly similar. I am surprised that Captain Ziegler 
should trouble the State of Pennsylvania about it. You were pleased to 
decide in favor of Ensign Spear, which was conclusive. If Captain Zieg- 
ler, through his efforts with the State, should obtain rank of Captain Fer- 
guson, certainly Ensign Denny, upon the same principle, is senior to En- 
sign Spear. It is my ardent wish that the new government may speedily 
be adopted, and that all these State affairs may cease. Wc may then 
hope for order and regularity. 



Same to Captain Heart. 

Fort Harmar, June 21, 1788. 
Sir — Your letter of the 19th of May, was handed to me at Fort Pitt 
by the Indian chief, Shundaushuawan. I directed him to remain at Fort 
Pitt until the arrival of Greneral Butler, and then to inform him of several 
of the white people having moved into their lands in the Grcnessee country, 
and having built houses, &c. From what I can learn, these people are not 
countenanced in their proceedings, either by the States of New York or 
Massachusetts. Be pleased to present my compliments to Lieutenant 
Frothingham. I am obliged to him for the east view of this garrison, 
which he was kind enough to inclose to me. In my last letter I mention- 
ed that the utmost vigilance was necessary at your post, in order to guard 
against surprise, as you are out of supporting distance, and more especially 
as the time of the men expires so soon. I am convinced that it is un- 
necessary to repeat these instructions. I hope to be able to reinforce you 

soon. 

I am, sir, with much esteem, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 



Same to Mr. Mulilenlerg. 

Fort Harmar, June 30, 1788. 
Dear Sir — I had the honor to address council on the 24th of April, 
from Fort Pitt, upon the subject of the Treasurer of Pennsylvania's three 
drafts on the County Treasurers of Westmoreland, Washington and Fay- 
ette, for monies for the recruiting service, and to inform your honorable 
body that there was a likelihood of obtaining nothing but the paper cur- 
rency for them, and at the same time praying that some other arrange- 
ments might speedily be made in order to obtain specie, as paper would 
not answer the purpose ; since which I have to acknowledge the receipt 
of two letters from the honorable the Vice President in council the one 
28 



434 APPEJ^DIX XO. I. 

dated the ISth of ApriJ, the other the 16th of May last. The former in- 
closed our State commissions ; the latter, I observe, desires that the final 
determination on the rank of ensigns Denny and Spear, may remain sus- 
pended until I have an opportunity to lay their several pretensions before 
the board. Respecting the dispute of rank between these gentlemen, a 
board of officers was convened a twelve month ago, in order to determine 
it. I did not choose to give my opinion at that time concerning it, but 
referred the proceedings to the Secretary at War, who was pleased to de- 
cide in favor of Ensign Spear, upon this principle, that Ensign Denny 
could not by virtue of his one year's service (which was considered as 
militia rank from the act of Congress of the 3d of June, 1784,) take rank 
of Ensign Spear, whose rank was derived from continental service. In 
consequence of this decision of the Secretary at War, orders have long 
since been issued by me, at this post, announcing Ensign Spear as the 
senior officer. I have been informed that Captain Ziegler is contesting 
rank with Captain Ferguson. The same principle which decides the rank 
of Ensign Denny and Ensign Spear, I presume, should operate in the case 
of Captain Ferguson and Captain Ziegler. The query is, whether the one 
j-ear's service was militia or continental rank ? If council should be of 
opinion that the one year's service was militia rank. Captain Ferguson is un- 
doubtedly senior to Captain Ziegler. As the right of finally judging upon 
this case rests with your honorable body, I beg leave to offer the following 
observation. Captain Ferguson is now absent at Post Vincennes, and per- 
haps has not in council one friend to advocate his cause. He is an officer 
of distinguished and superior abilities in the artillery department. The 
consequence will be, that if Captain Ziegler obtains rank of him, he will 
instantly resign, which will be a loss, not only to the State of Pennsylvania, 
but the States in general. I question very much, whether an officer of 
equal abilities of his grade and in his line, can be furnished by any State in 
the Union. Doctor John M'Dowell has resigned his commission on the 1st 
instant. The surgeon's mate, Richard Allison, is fully qualified, I believe, 
to succeed him. There will be a vacancy now for a surgeon's mate from 
our State. Doctor Scott, the surgeon's mate of the Jersey quota, begs me 
to recommend a friend of his, Mr. John F. Carmichael, (a native of Penn- 
sylvania). I have no knowledge of the young gentleman, but from Doc- 
tor Scott's representation, I beg leave to recommend him to fill the vacan- 
cy, provided the honorable council thinks it proper, and has no other 
person in view. 

I have the honor to be, &c.. 

Jos. Harmar. 
The Ilonorablc Peter Muhlenberg, Esq., 

Vice President in Council, Pennsylvania. 



LETTEES. 435 

Same to Major Wyllys. 

FOBT Harmab., July Ifi, 1788. 
Dear Major — By this conveyance Ensign Denny sends both for you 
and Major Hamtramck, your proportion of stationery. I never conceived 
Sullivan's letter to be of such an alarming nature as the Secretary at War 
imagined it. Lieutenant Armstrong's report fully convinces me that the 
matter was highly blown, and that no mutinous designs are in agitation, 
cither in the country called the State of Franklin, the Cumberland set- 
tlements, or the district of Kentucky. If Sullivan should set his foot in 
the Western Territory, endeavor to have him apprehended, but no where 
else. 

Jos. Harmar. 
Major Wtllts, Commanding officer at the Rapids of Ohio. 



Same to Captain Heart. 

Fort Harmar, July 28, 1788, 
Sir — The view of the works on French creek, also a map inscribed to 
President Franklin, have been received. Corporal Morgan delivered the 
public boat which was built at your post. The boards with which she was 
loaded, being part public and part private property, were received by En- 
bign Denny, who acts as quarter-master during the absence of Lieutenant 
Pratt. 

Jos. Harmar. 



Same to Captain Ziegler. 

Fort Harmar, August 7, 1788. 
Dear Sir — I have received your several letters from Philadelphia and 
one from Carlisle. I expect this will find you at Fort Pitt. The Six 
Nations are on their way by water to the treaty, which is to be held at 
this post. I am informed that several vagabonds in the neighborhood of 
Wheeling, mean to fire upon these Indians on their passage down the 
Ohio to this post. Such a step might be attended with ruinous conse- 
quences. You are hereby ordered to take the said Indians under your pro- 
tection and safely escort them to this garrison. Treat them kindly, and if 
any of these lawless rascals should presume to fire upon them, you are 
ordered to land and attack them in return, for their insolence and defiance 
of the supreme authority. 

I am, dear sir, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 
Captain David Zieqlee, at Fort Pitt. 



436 APPENDIX NO. I. 

Same to Lieutenant Ernest. 

Fort Habmak, October 8, 1788. 
Dear Sir — Be pleased to deliver to Major Kirkpatrick the inclosed two 
bank notes, of twenty dollars each, and tell the generous Major, that he 
may shortly expect a final settlement. Permit me to congratulate you 
upon your nuptials. I wish you and Mrs. Ernest ^ (in which Mrs. Har- 
mar joins me,) every happiness the marriage state can afford. 

I am, dear sir, &c. 

Jos. Harmar. 
Lieutenant Ernest, commanding officer at Fort Pitt. 



Same to Major Hamtramch. 

Fort Harmak, October 13, 1788. 
Dear Major — You will act properly in seizing and confining the Gross 
Tete, or any other villains who were accessory to the murder committed at 
Sullivan's Station. I observe by your letter of the 12th of August, the 
severe stroke which the party under Lieutenant Peters has received. The 
intelligence has been transmitted to the War Office. The new government 
I hope will soon operate, and expect in the course of the next year we 
shall not tamely suffer the subjects of the United States to be murdered 
by these perfidious savages. The savages are, in my opinion, hatching a 
great deal of mischief. T have detached a captain's command, with Cap- 
tain Hutchins, the geographer, for his protection to the mouth of the 
Scioto, in order to survey the exterior lines of Messrs. Cutler and Sar- 
gent's purchase, which weakens this garrison considerably, at the present 
moment more especially. Let your fort be named Fort Knox. 
I am, dear sir, &c., 



Major Hamtramck, commanding at Vincennes. 



Jos. Harmar. 



Same to Major WyVys. 

Fort Harmar, December 9, 1788. 
Dear Major — I have the pleasure to acknowledge the receipt of your 
two letters of the 1st and 13th ultimo. I am sorry to observe your ill 
state of health, and that of your garrison. The Falls is certainly a very 
unhealthy position ; I wish you to make the proper inquiry concerning the 
route to Chota, and transmit it to me. I have directed Ensign Denny to 
furnish you with as many camp kettles, knapsacks and haversacks as wo 

1 Judge 'William Wilkins' sister. 



LETTERS. 437 

can spare. It is a mortifying affair that you were obliged to call upon 
the militia for the cattle escort. It is my wish that not a single officer of 
the regiment may ever have the mortifying disgrace of being subjected to 
militia command, but suppose in the present case you found it unavoida- 
ble. I wish you to be made fully acquainted with the proceedings of the 
convention and the politics of Kentucky, and transmit me the intelligence. 
There is a Mr. Conolly now at Louisville, very likely for no good purposes ; 
you know his base character. It will be well to keep a watchful eye over 
him. The Governor has written to you upon the occasion. We are at 
length likely to have a treaty, as the Indians are on their way and near at 
hand to this post. Please transmit the rolls to Captain Bcatty ; through 
the wilderness I think will be the safest and most expeditious conveyance. 
Captain Ashton's men are to be mustered from the expiration of their old 
enlistments, which will make their time of service the regular six years. 

Mrs. Harmar desires her compliments may be presented to you and the 
officers of the garrison, and believe me to be with very great esteem and 
regard, 

Your most obedient servant, 

Jos. Harmar, 

Major Wyllys, commanding officer at Fort Steuben, 
at the Rapids of the Ohio. 



Same to General Mifflin. 

Fort Harmar, December 12, 1788. 
My Dear General — It affords me singular happiness to hear of your 
appointment to the presidency of the State. Permit me most sincerely to 
congratulate you upon the occasion. Your introductory letter in favor of, 
Captain Bartlet, has been received. I understand that he is somewhere 
up the river with his family, and does not mean to visit our quarter until 
spring ; upon his arrival every attention in my power shall be paid him. 
As for the news, we are at length likely to have a treaty. Brant has been 
using all his influence to prevent the savages holding it at this post, but 
a number of nations are now near at hand, and are expected in the course 
of two or three days. Brant has decamped and drawn off as many as he 
could, but notwithstanding, his influence is not so universal as was imag- 
ined. It is a difficult matter for our yellow brethren to enter into a gen- 
eral confederacy and to preserve it. They are much divided in their 
councils. The bearer. Captain Ferguson, is a very worthy officer; suffer 
mc to recommend liim to your notice. Be pleased to present my most af- 



438 APPENDIX NO. I. 

fectionate regard to Mrs. Mifflin and Mrs. Talbot, in which Mrs. Harmar 
joins mc. 

And believe me to be, most sincerely, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

His Excellency Thomas Mifflin, Esq., 

President of the State of Pennsylyania. 



Same to General Knox. 

Fort Harmae, December 15, 1788. 
Sir — Lieutenant Kersey was at the Great Kanahwa (eighty-nine meas- 
ured miles from this garrison) on the 1st instant; the party all well. I 
have not heard of the party under Ensign M'Dowell, but am in hopes 
that he has not been interrupted. My calculation is, that before Christ- 
mas the two exterior lines of Messrs. Cutler and Sargent's purchase will 
be completed. The geographer is at present sick at Fort Pitt. If he was 
able to come down and take the latitude of the northern corner of the 
tenth township of the seventh range, Mr. Ludlow, who is a smart active 
young fellow, could run the northern boundary; the purchase money 
could then be paid, that business finished, and in the spring the next af- 
fair would be, to take up Judge Symmes' purchase. Several chiefs of the 
different nations arrived at this post the day before yesterday. The in- 
habitants of Kentucky, I am informed, have it in contemplation to declare 
themselves not only independent of the State of Virginia, but of the 
United States altogether. I have written to Major Wyllys to make ine 
acquainted with their politics, and to watch closely the conduct of a cer- 
tain Mr. Conolly, who has hired a house at the Falls, and from his base 
character, can certainly be planning no good for the United States. 
I have the honor, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

The Honorable Major-General Knox, Secretary at War, New York. 



JSa77ie to Lieiitenani Frotliingliam. 

Fort Harmar, December 15, 1788. 
Sir — I have directed Ensign Denny to send you by this conveyance, 
one thousand white wampum. I must impress upon you in the strongest 
terms the absolute necessity of the utmost vigilance at Fort Franklin, in 
order to guard against surprise. I observe that great harmony still sub- 
sists bctvyccu the troops and the Senccas who arc hunting in the vicinity 



LETTEES. 439 

of your garrison ; but all our yellow brethren seem to be perfidious ; I 
would have you, therefore, never to be off your guard. 
I am, sir, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 
Lieutenant Ebenezek Frothinguam, commanding ofi&cer at Fort Franklin. 



Same to Captain John Irwin, at Fort Pitt. 

Fort Harmae, January 20, 1789. 
Dear Sir — I owe Major Kirkpatrick three half-johannes, which I wish 
you to pay as soon as you can make it convenient. 

I am, dear sir, yours sincerely, 

Jos. Harmar. 
Captain John Irwin, at Fort Pitt. 



Same to Major Wyllys. 

Fort Hajjuar, January 22, 1789: 
Dear Major — It is not improbable but that two companies will be or- 
dered to be stationed at the mouth of the Great Miami, not only as a bet- 
ter cover for Kentucky, but also to afford protection to Judge Symmcs in 
his intended settlement there. It appears to me that there is an absolute 
necessity for a party to be stationed at the Kapids, their sole object should 
be to furnish escorts, &c., to supply Major Hamtramck with provisions. 
If the two companies should be ordered to take post at or near the mouth 
of the Great Miami, provisions can be conveniently laid in and forwarded 
from Limestone by Lieutenant Schuyler. 

I am, dear Major, &c. 

Jos. Harmar. 



Same to David Duncan. 

Fort Harmar, February 25, 1789. 
Let me know, by the first opportunity, whether you will pnvchnsc my 
black horse or not. I paid twenty-five pounds, specie, for him. There is 
a balance due from me to Captain O'Hara; if it does not suit you to take 
the horse, perhaps you can arrange the business with him. If he take 
him and credit me with the above sura of £24, it will answer the same 
end. Your obedient servant, 

Jos, Harmar. 



440 APPENDIX NO. I. 

Same to N'icholas Waj/. 
FoKT Habmak, at the mouth of the Muskingum river, "» 
March 12th, 1789. I 

Dear Sir — I have the pleasure to acknowledge the receipt of your in- 
troductory letter, in favor of Captain Israel Gilpin and his family. They 
halted but an hour or two at this garrison, being bound for the district of 
Kentucky. It will give me peculiar pleasure to afford, not only them but 
any other gentlemen whom you may please to recommend to my notice, 
every protection and countenance in my power. 

Your observations respecting the proper names to be given to towns, 
rivers, islands, &c., in the settlement of the western country, I think to be 
very just. The original Indian names are generally expressive of some 
peculiar and distinguishing quality or circumstance, and I am clearly of 
opinion with you that they ought to be adopted in preference to our copy- 
ing names from England and other parts of Europe. 
I am, dear sir, with very great esteem, 

Your friend and humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 
Doctor Nicholas Wat, at "Wilmington, State of Delaware. 



Same to Honorable James White. 

Fort Habmae, March 22, 1789. 
My dear Sir — I had the honor of receiving your letter from Lime- 
stone, and have, agreeably to your request, sent down your bridle (which 
my servant forgot to deliver) to Mr. Lacassagne. 

We have nothing new in this quarter. A vast deal of industry is dis- 
played by our New England brethren, in their settlement on the opposite 
shore. They will soon be in a very flourishing condition, especially as 
they expect a number of emigrators from their several States, to join them 
in the course of the ensuing summer 

With very great esteem and regard, 

Jos. Harmar. 

To the Honorable James White, Member of Congress at New York. 



Same to Lieutenant Ernest. 

Fort Harmar, April 27, 1789. 
Dear Sir — The clergyman, Mr. Story, at last arrived with my dis- 
patches; perhaps he might have been a little dilatory in the delivery of 



L E T T E E S . 441 

them ; but he appears to me, to be a gentleman of liberal sentiments, and 
I shall notice him accordingly. 

I observe that the post rider makes a practice of bringing small matters 
for the people in Pittsburgh, under twelve pounds weight. If I should 
have occasion to employ him, I will write to you to be so good as to attend 
to it. The garden which you have laid out, commanding a view of the 
three rivers, must be beautiful indeed by your description. You need be 
under very little apprehension of a removal, as I shall always want an 
officer stationed at Fort Pitt. Be pleased to acquaint Mr. Devereux 
Smith that his runaway servant, whom he wrote to me about, was appre- 
hended at this garrison, and Lieutenant Pratt sent him up the river a few 
days since, in Mr. Wilkins' canoe. 

I am, &c. 

Jos. Harmar. 

Lieutenant Matthew Ernest, commanding officer at Fort Pitt. 



Same to Major Doughty. 

Fort Harmar, April 28, 1789. 
Dear Major — ^I am hourly expecting the arrival of Mr. Ilackenwelder, 
the Moravian Missionary, at which time I shall afford another subaltern's 
command to Major Sargent, for his protection, as he has the surveying of 
the lands up the Muskingum, granted by Congress to the Moravian In- 
dians. The new government, I suppose, engages the whole attention of 
all ranks and degrees. I sincerely hope that by this time General Wash- 
ington has the reins and has set the wheels in motion. All is peace and 
quietness in this quarter, at least nothing has come to my knowledge to 
the contrary. The New England gentlemen are extremely industrious ; 
Campus Martins is nearly completed. Gay circles of ladies, balls, &c., 
which I have neither time nor inclination to frequent, these are the changes 
which in three years this wilderness has undergone. Mrs. Harmar presents 
you her best respects. 

I am, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 
Major John Doughty, commandant of artillery at New York. 



Same to Mr. Hillegas. 

Fort Harmar, April 30, 1789. 
Dear Sir — I had the pleasure of receiving your letter by Captain Brad- 
ford, and now send you some more of the buffalo wool, of a superior quality 



442 APPENDIX NO. I. 

to the former. In the months of February and March, is the time the wool 
is in proper season. I am apprehensive what was at first sent will not 
answer your purpose. But few buflfalo are killed in the vicinity of the 
Muskingum. When I was in your office at Philadelphia, if I recollect 
right, you gave me a detail of the Khode Island hero's exploits with the 
Prussian Greneral ; some part of them I have forgotten ; when you have 
a leisure moment, I will thank you to relate the matter to me, as I wish 
to laugh a little upon the occasion. 

I am, &c., 

Jos. Harmak. 

Michael Hillegas, Continental Treasurer at New York. 



Sa77ie to Lieutenant Sj^ear. 

Fort Harmak, May 25, 1789. 
Sir — You will continue to transmit me all the Indian intelligence 
which may come to your knowledge, and let not the least occurrence worthy 
of notice escape your attention. It is unnecessary for me to remind you 
that the utmost vigilance is always necessary at your post, in order to 
guard against surprise. Respecting your rank, as I mentioned to you in 
my former letter, I have used every exertion in my power in your behalf, 
but council have determined the matter against you, as you will see by 
the inclosed copy of their proceedings, which came to hand a few days 
since, inclosing a State commission of a Lieutenancy for Mr. Denny. 
I am, sir, with esteem, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 
Lieutenant Edward Spear, commanding officer at the Falls of Beaver. 



Same to General Hoioell. 

Fort Harmar, August 81, 1789. 
My dear Sir — It afforded me singular satisfaction when I heard of 
your being appointed to your present office ; permit your friend sincerely 
to congratulate you upon the occasion. You have been so obliging as to 
forward me the Federal Gazette which Beatty has subscribed for, which 
demands my thanks. Be kind enough to continue forwarding that paper, 
as I think it a very useful one. I have had it in contemplation, amidst 
the general joy, to address our illustrious President, in behalf of the 
regiment, but so much time has elapsed that it is more than probable an 
address now would rather be out of season. This I am very confident of. 



LETTERS. 443 

that every officer, one and all of us, entertain the highest love and venera- 
tion for his character, and pray heaven to prosper his administration. 

Mrs. Harmar desires to be affectionately remembered to you, and accept 
my best wishes for your health and happiness. 
Believe me to be, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

Joseph Howell, Jr., Esq., Paymaster-General at New York. 



Same to Lieutenant Ernest. 

Fort Harmar, September 12, 1789. 
Dj3AR Sir — I am very glad to hear of the birth of your son, and con- 
gratulate you thereupon. I consent to your having granted Mr. Turnbull 
permission to run a fence for the conveniency of his pasture on the Alle- 
gheny river, but take care and suffer no further encroachments. Messrs. 
Craig and Turnbull have been long trying, at the War Office, to obtain the 
sole possession of the area and the buildings (I believe) of Fort Pitt, but 
without success. 

With great esteem, &c., J 



Same to General Knox. 

Fort Harmar, September 12, 1789. 
Dear Sir — Major Doughty informs me in his letter dated the 21st 
ultimo, that he arrived at the Little Miami on the 16th, and after recon- 
noitring for three days from thence to the Big Miami, for an eligible sit- 
uation whereon to erect the works for head-quarters, he had at length 
determined to fix upon a spot opposite Licking river, which he represents 
as high and healthy, abounding with never failing springs, &c., and the 
most proper position he could find for the purpose. 



Same to Captain Irwin. 

Fort Harmar, September 21, 1789. 
Dear Sir — I have received your letter of the 1st of August, and am 
really sorry to find that Captain Christie disappointed you in not honor- 
ing your draft for the two hundred dollars specie ; the delay on this occa- 
sion has been no loss to me ; therefore your looking on yourself bound to 
make restitution is needless. Upon the whole, unless you meant to reside 
here with your family, I believe it is full as well for you not to have a 
concern in the purchase. 



444 



APPENDIX NO 



If there should he an addition to the present estahlishment, you may 
be assured, sir, it will afford me peculiar pleasure to be in any degree in- 
strumental in procuring you a commission, or serving you all in my power. 
Your merits as an officer are well known to me, and I am certain the 
President of the United States has not forgotten you. One thing is to 
be observed, that the officers serving on the present establishment ought, 
in my opinion, to be advanced first and I shall exert all my influcriCC in 
their favor; but if an addition takes place, as it certainly must in a short 
time, you may depend on my interest to serve you as far as I think com- 
patible with the good of the regiment, and so as not to prejudice the feel- 
ings of the officers now in the service. 

Be i^leased to present my compliments to Mrs. Irwin and your sister, 
and believe me to be 

Your friend and humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 
Captain John Irwin, at Pittsburgh. 
(Favored by Mr. Vigo.) 



Same to Colonel Francis Johnston. 

Fort IIarmar, September 22, 1789. 
My dear Sir — The bearer, Mr. Vigo, is a gentleman from Post Vin- 
cennes, a friend of mine; he has always behaved with the utmost atten- 
tion to the officers and troops stationed in that quarter ; permit me to 
recommend him to your notice. Any civilities you may show him, shall 
be looked upon as given to your humble servant. He will present you 
with a head of a curious fish, from Mr. Armstrong. 

Mrs. Harmar desires her best respects may be offered to Mrs. Johns- 
ton and yourself. I wish you would write me frequently, and do not 
attribute it to negligence if you do not receive frequent answers, as without 
flattery (which I detest), there is no person for whom I have a greater esteem. 
I am shortly going to make my head-quarters down opposite Licking river. 

Adieu, 

Jos. Harmar. 
Colonel Francis Johnston, Philadelphia. 



Same to General Butler. 

Fort Harmar, September 28, 1789. 
Dear Sir — I received your friendly letter of tlic 15th instant, by Cap- 
tain Heart, wherein I observe that Pittsburgh is your present place of 



LETTERS. 445 

residence. Your humble servant is a bird of passage. Sometime the 
latter end of next month, or beginning of November, I shall move down 
the river, bag and baggage (leaving Ziegler's and Heart's companies at 
this post for the protection of our New England brethren), and shall fix 
my head-quarters opposite Licking river. I am in hourly expectation of 
the Governor. 

Mrs. Harmar and myself beg to be affectionately remembered to Mrs. 
Butler, yourself and family. I hope that game leg of yours is perfectly 
recovered. The tea sent by Lieutenant Humphrey was very good ; will 
you be pleased to send him my compliments, with thanks for the same. 
Don't forget to write to me, and believe me to be. 

Your friend and humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 

General Richard Butlek, at Pittsburgh. 



Same to Thomas Mifflin, Esq., Philadelphia. 

Fort Harmar, November 9, 1789. 
My dear General— It would afford me great happiness if you could 
steal three or four months from the Atlantic, and spend them with me. 
I am now on the wing, expecting to move down the Ohio in a few days, 
and to fix head-quarters opposite the mouth of the Licking river, about 
three hundred miles below this garrison, where I should be proud of being 
honored with your company. Venison, two or three inches deep cut of 
fat turkeys at one pence per pound, buffalo in abundance, and cat-fish 
of 'one hundred pounds weight, are stories that are by no means exagger- 
ated. I am going to a country where there is a much greater plenty of 
game than there is here at present. Our New England brethren are a 
very industrious set of people. With the protection afforded them by the 
troops (which they acknowledge with great gratitude), they have convert- 
ed the wilderness into a fine state of cultivation. Their settlement bids 
fair to be very flourishing. Cornfields, gardens, &c., now appear in places 
which were lately the habitation of wild beasts. Such are the glorious ef- 
fects of industry. 

The bearer, Lieutenant Denny, is my adjutant; his long and laithtui 
services claim my warmest regard for him ; permit me to introduce him 
to your civilities. Will you be so kind as to offer my respects to Mentges 
and FuUerton ? Craig I shall shortly write to. 

Believe me to be, with the greatest esteem and affection. 

Your Excellency's obliged friend and humble servant, 

Jos. Harmab. 



446 APPENDIX NO. I. 

Lieutenant Denny to General Uarmar. 

PiTTSBUROii, November 22, 1789. 

Dear General — We did not arrive here until the 19th, owing to 
bad oars, indifferent oarsmen, and meeting two smart floods; however, 
we got safe, and had the pleasure to find Major "Wyllys, Captain Beatty, 
Captain Mercer, Lieutenant Peters, Ensign Sedam and Doctor Allison in 
town. They arrived two days before us. The Governor is expected in 
town to-morrow or next day. His boat is here waiting for him, and Mr. 
William St. Clair, who came from Detroit to Fort Harmar last winter, ac- 
companies him down the river. I have endeavored to impress Mr. Elliott 
with a just idea of the condition of the posts below with respect to pro- 
visions. He says he feels more concerned than we possibly can. He 
goes down himself in a few days. 

I am very sorry, indeed, that I have to inform you of the loss of one 
of the most serviceable members of the Western Territory, General Par- 
sons. He left the old Moravian town up Beaver early on the 17th, on board 
a canoe, accompanied only by one man. Sent his horses down by land. 
About one o'clock that day, as we entered the mouth of the creek we 
met the wreck of a canoe, with a good deal of her cargo drifting down, 
all separately. Part of the loading we took up. When we got to the 
block-house, Mr. M'Dowell told us they had taken up a piece of the 
canoe, a bundle of skins, and had seen a pair of saddle-bags, which were 
well known to be the judge's, and the same evening the man arrived with 
the horses, and told us he left the judge early that morning about 
twenty-five miles up the creek, that he intended to dine that day with 
Mr. M'Dowell at the block-house, and the man knew the property which 
we took up to be part of what was in General Parson's canoe, leaves no 
doubt of his being lost in attempting the Falls of Beaver. The canoe 
was very much shattered, and bottom uppermost, when we met her. Mr. 
M'Dowell has made search on both sides the creek, above and below the 
falls, but can make no further discovery, more than finding part of the 
canoe at the foot of a remarkably dangerous fall in the creek, which 
strengthens the belief that there the old gentleman met his fate. 

I shall be glad to be aifectionately remembered to Mrs. Harmar, while 
I remain, &c., 

E. Dennt. 



General Harmar to Lieut. Ernest. 

Fort Harmar, November 27, 1789. 
Dear Sir — My last letter was dated the 10th instant, and forwarded 



LETTERS. 447 

by Luuteuaal Denny, since wliicli I have the pleasure to acknowledge the 
receip'^ of your several letters. 

The thres fellows of Captain Mercer's party whom you sent on by 
Sergeai^t Hays, received a proper flagellation at this post, for the robberies 
committed by them at Pittsburgh ; they have every appearance of villains. 
You had better inform Captain Beatty that you paid ?25.06 to release 
Johnson, the recruit, from the hands of the constable, in order that the 
stoppages may hs made for you. The five muskets, five bayonets and 
belts, five cartridge boxes and belts, and Mrs. Harmar's saddle tofcther 
with my large Kentucky boat, were all safely delivered by Sergeant Ilays. 

Ecspecting the ofiice of Pay-master to the regiment, I make not the least 
doubt that you wi'il have a great majority of votes for it, now Beatty is 
promoted ; this you may depend upon, you shall have all my interest and 
influence upon the occasion, as I am certain there is no officer in either of 
the corps equally qualified with yourself to fill it. 

I believe I am in arrears to Captain Irwin, if he has paid Major Kilpat- 
rick the three half-johannes which I owed him ; if so, give my compli- 
ments to Captain Beatty, and tell him to reimburse Captain Irv/in and 
charge the same to my account. Will you be pleased to present my com- 
pliments also to Major Wyllys and the other officers at Fort Pitt. 
I am, dear sir, with great esteem, your humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 

Lieut. Matt. Ernest, comm. oflBcer at Fort Pitt. 



Same to the Committee of the Ohio Company, &c. 

Head-Quarters, Fort Washington, January 8, 1790. 
Gentlemen — ^I received your polite address, and thank you for your 
afi"ectionate wishes for my welfare. Be assured, gentlemen, that I left 
Muskingum with regret. Tt always gave me pleasure to advance the in- 
terests of the Ohio Company, and although absent from you at present, 
the time may come when I shall again be with you. That your settlement 
may continue rapidly to increase and flourish, and you, gentlemen, experi- 
ence every degree of prosperity and happiness^ is the sincere and ardent 
wish of one -who is, with the greatest esteem and afi'ection, 
Your most obedient and very humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 
To Colonel Sproat, ColoneUlEros, Rev. Dr. Story, Mr. C. Greene. Mr. Paul Fear- 
ing, Commodore Whipple, General TuppER, Mr. Woopbridge, Mnjor Sergeant, 
Mr. Parsons, and Colonel Shepard— addressers in behalf of the Ohio Company, 
and the inhabitants of the settlement at Marietta. 



448 APPENDIX NO. I. 

Same to General Knox. 
Head-Quartees, Fort Washington, January 14, 1790. 

Sir — I have the honor to acknowledge the receipt of your letter of the 
29th October last, to which I shall now particularly reply. 

The Governor of the Western Territory arrived at this post on the 2d 
instant, and departed from hence on the 5th for the Illinois country. I 
furnished him, agreeably to his request, with an escort of fifty chosen 
men, under the immediate command of Lieut. Doyle. Major Wyllys ac- 
companies him on this tour. I did not leave the Muskingum until the 
24th ult., being detained so long waiting for his and the Pay-master's 
arrival there. We were four days upon our passage. The distance from 
thence to this garrison, (which is directly opposite the mouth of Licking 
river,) is about three hundred miles. Major Doughty is left to command 
at Fort Harmar. 

This will be one of the most solid, substantial wooden fortresses, when 
finished, of any in the Western Territory. It is built of hewn timber, a 
perfect square, two stories high, with four block-houses at the angles. I 
am particularly indebted to Captain Ferguson and Lieutenant Pratt, for 
their indefatigable industry and attention in forwarding the work thus far. 
The plan is Major Dough ty's. On account of its superior excellence, I 
have thought proper to honor it with the name of Fort Washington. The 
public ought to be benefited by the sale of these buildings whenever we 
evacuate them, although they will cost them but little. 

About forty or fifty Kentucky boats have begun, and will complete it. 
Limestone is the grand mart of Kentucky; whenever boats arrive there 
they are scarcely of any value to the owners j they are frequently set 
adrift in order to make room for the arrival of others. I have contracted 
for the above number for the moderate price of from one to two dollars 
each ; thus much for the plank work. All other expenses (wagon hire, 
nails, and some glass excepted,) are to be charged to the labor of the 
troops. The lime we have burned ourselves, and the stone is at hand. 
Be pleased to receive the inclosed plan of the fort. The distance between 
the Little and Great Miami is twenty-eight measured miles. Near the 
Little Miami there is a settlement called Columbia ; here (seven miles 
distant from Columbia), there is another named Losanteville, but lately 
changed to Cincinnati, and Judge Symmes himself resides at the other, 
about fifteen miles from hence, called the Miami City, at the north bend 
of the Ohio river. They are, in general, but small cabins, and the inhab- 
itants of the poorer class of people. 

It is very probable that the Creek nation, under Mr. M'Gilliviay, may be 
troublesome on the frontiers of Georgia, &c., during the ensuing summer, 



LETTERS. 449 

and especially as you inform me that the commissioners who were ap- 
pointed to hold a treaty with them, returned from the Omee river unsuc- 



I observe that the Grovernor of the Western Territory is empowered by 
the President of the United States, in case the hostilities of the Indians 
should render the measure inevitable, to call on the nearest counties of 
Pennsylvania and Virginia, for militia — not exceeding, in the whole, fifteen 
hundred — to act in conjunction with the federal troops, in such opera- 
tions, offensive and defensive, as the said Governor and the commanding 
officer of the troops, conjointly, shall judge necessary for the public ser- 
vice, and protection of the inhabitants and posts. You may rest assured, 
sir, that in all these cases, the most perfect harmony will ever subsist 
between the Governor and myself. 

By this time it is presumed Congress is convened, and that instead of a 
temporary, a permanent establishment of the troops will be made. 

Lieutenant Armstrong, I see, has been writing to the War Office about 
brevet rank. He is a valuable officer, but instead of troubling you upon 
the occasion, it is my opinion he should have represented his grievances, 
if any there were, unto his commanding officer. 

By the latest advices from Major Hamtramck he writes me that he had 
manoeuvred in such a manner as to divide the Weea Indians, and that 
eighty of their warriors had come into Post Vinccnnes, and put them- 
selves under the protection of the United States. This may be considered 
as a very favorable circumstance, provided these yellow gentry adhere to 
their allegiance. 

The difficulty of forwarding my dispatches from this post to the War 
Office, is great. Up the river, from here to Fort Pitt, is about five hun- 
dren miles ; it is too fatiguing to be monthly sending a boat against the 
stream for the purpose, unless an extraordinary occasion should require it. 
I am therefore making arrangements to send my letters to Danville, in 
Kentucky, from thence to be forwarded through the wilderness and de- 
posited in the post-office at Richmond, which I believe to be the most ex- 
peditious conveyance. 

I have the honor to be, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

The Honorable Major-General Knox, Secretary at War, New York. 



Same to Ensign Jeffers. 
Head-Quarters, Fort 'Washington, February 1, 1790. 
giR — I have the pleasure to acknowledge the receipt of your letters 
29 



450 APPENDIX NO. I. 

dated the 5tli October, the 6tli November, the 1st December and 2d Jan- 
uary last, vrith the several inclosures. You will continue to send me reg- 
ular monthly returns, dated on the first day of each month, of your com- 
mand ; also, of military and quarter-master stores, inspection returns, and 
quantity of provisions on hand, so that I may know the exact state of 
your garrison. I have been informed that the men, before Captain H. 
was ordered from Fort Franklin, were almost continually employed on 
fatigue, and principally for his own private emolument. That they were 
more of farmers than soldiers, was very evident upon their arrival at Fort 
Ilarmar — they were chiefly naked. Such conduct is a disgrace to the 
regiment, and any officer acting in like manner in future, shall be called 
to a severe account for it. I do not believe you will countenance such 
matters ; I mention it to let you know that such unmilitary proceedings 
will always meet with my greatest displeasure. The plan of the fort 
which you have forwarded to me, I suppose to be a true representation of 
it as it now stands. In case of danger, you have not men sufficient to de- 
fend it. The block-house should be your principal defense. You will do 
well, therefore, to contract the works as much as possible. 

I would have you, by all means, to cultivate a good understanding with 
the Cornplanter, in order to counteract the designs of Brant and his ad- 
herents. I believe him to be a friend of the United States. Give my com- 
pliments to him, and tell him I am very glad to hear that he is well, aL>d 
to keep fast hold of the chain of friendship. 

I would have you to use every means in your power to conciliate the 
minds of the Indians in your quarter, and to impress them with the majesty 
of the United States, and their sincere and friendly disposition toward 
them ; at the same time, you must use the utmost precaution to avoid sur- 
prise. The savages may make the greatest professions of friendship, and 
be deceitful at last; therefore, never be off your guard with them. 

If you should hear anything further of the intelligence given you by 
Half-Town, the Seneca chief, who informed you that there was great talk 
of the Mohawks going to war against the Muskingum people the ensuing 
spring, you will instantly give me information of it. 

I cannot conclude this letter without repeating to you, and strongly en- 
joining upon you, the strict observance of economy to be used in all your 
departments, and the utmost vigilance and discipline to be exercised with 
your command. 

I am, sir, &c., 

Jos. Harmae. 

Ensign John Jeffebs, commanding officer at Fort Franklin, on French Creek. 



LETTERS. '451 

Same to Mr. Jonathan Williams. 
Head-Quarters, Fort Washington, February 25, 1790. 
Dear Sir — I had the pleasure of receiving a friendly line from you, 
by Captain Ferguson, and oan well remember the gay moments we passed 
together in France, particularly the civilities received from you at the Pal- 
ace at St. Germain en Laye, where I dined with you in company with 
Mr. Barclay and Colonel Franks. Here we are delightfully situated on 
the most beautiful river in the world. La Belle Riviere, opposite the mouth 
of Licking, in Kentucky. You'll wonder at this, when you call to mind 
the handsome meanders of the Seine at the foot of your old quarters. 
Society, unless what the military aflfords, is entirely out of the question. 
Buflfalo, venison, turkeys, and fish of an enormous size (when the season 
arrives), we have in the greatest abundance. If ever Mh^-Fortune, the 
slippery jade, should direct your course to the westward, it will give me 
great pleasure to regale you with some of our dainties. You shall have a 
hearty, soldierly welcome. 

Believe me, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

Mr. Jonathan Williams, Merchant, Philadelphia. 

(To the care of Dr. Franklin.) 
P. S. — If you see Franks, give my compliments to him, and tell him I 
received his introductory letter in favor of Mr. Mitchell. 



Same to Daniel Clymer 

Head-Quarters, Fort Washington, March 1, 1790. 

My dear Sir — Captain Pratt handed me a few lines from you, dated 
at Beading. I should be happy to see you here. We can afford you 
buffalo and venison in abundance. 

C , I find, keeps manoeuvring a little after the old manner. Some- 
time or other he must certainly get his quietus. It is surprising to me 
how he escapes from the numerous fracases he is engaged in. I am in- 
formed that Shannon at Easton had liked to have gutted him with a 
knife in a dispute they had together. He is a clever fellow, notwith- 
standing all his foibles. 

We are most beautifully situated where we are at present, on the hand- 
some river Ohio, and directly opposite Licking in Kentucky. 

I have heard of no news or disturbance lately from our yellow brethren. 
From Fort Pitt you can easily glide down the current to see me; it is 
about five hundred miles. This month I expect we shall have great 
plenty of fish ; such as pike, perch, bass, buffalo, sturgeon and cat ; the 



452 ATPEXDIX NO. I. 

latter of an enormous size. What would you think of being regaled 
with one of one hundred weight ? There are some actually caught of 
that weight. 

The bearer, Lieutenant Kingsbury, is an officer of mine, and is in- 
trusted with several private letters of consequence for Philadelphia. He 
strikes off from Reading to Easton. Will you be pleased to notice him ? 
I shall direct him to leave the letters in your care, which I beg may be 
safely forwarded by you. 

I am, dear sir, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

Daniel Cltmer, Esq., at Reading, Pennsylvania. 



Same to Governor Huntingdon. 

HiiAD-QtTARTEns, FoET WASHINGTON, March 2, 1790. 

Sir — Lieutenant Pratt handed me a few lines from your Excellency, 
in which I observe his conduct, whilst employed on the recruiting service 
in the State of Connecticut, was such as to meet entire approbation. Al- 
though I have not the honor of being personally acquainted with your 
Excellency, I beg leave to address you on the following subject : 

It is more than probable that an augmentation of the regular troops 
will take place (indeed I believe the measure will be found absolutely 
necessary), in which case suffer me to mention Major "Wyllys as a very 
honest, brave, deserving officer, and in every point of A'iew adequate to the 
command of a regiment. I am induced to offer his recommendation, not 
from any solicitation of the major's, but as he is now absent in the Illi- 
nois country, and there may be some candidates at home who are upon 
the courtier establishment, I cannot refrain (from the esteem I have for 
his character,) expressing my wishes to your Excellency upon this occasion. 

The officers at present in service, forming the Connecticut quota, have 
conducted themselves with military propriety, and greatly to my satisfac- 
tion. I should be happy to see them advanced also, when vacancies take 
place or more troops are raised. 

I have the honor to be, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

His Excellency Samuel IIuntingion, Esq., 

Governor of the State of Connecticut, at Norwich. 



Same to Richard Graham. 
Head-Quarters, Fort Washinoton, March C, 1790. 
Dear Sir — I had the pleasure of receiving a few lines from you, dated 



LETTERS. 458 

at Dumfries the 12tli last September. I sliall be happy to see you at our new 
quarters. "We have no particular news. The savages lately murdered some 
people at a small station about fourteen miles above Limestone, and will 
continue their carnages and depredations until government raise a proper 
force to sweep them off the face of the earth. I have detached Major 
Wyllys to accompany Governor St. Clair, who has set out for the Illinois 
country, there to regulate civil affairs. 

Mrs. Harmar joins in respectful compliments to you. 
Believe me, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

Mr. Richard Graham, Merchant, Dumfries. 

P. S. — Will you be pleased to present my regards to General Gates ? I 
hope he enjoys his health. 



Same to Jolm Clems Symmcs. 

Head-Quarters, Fort Washington, March 7, 1790. 
Dear Sir — I shall want about an acre of land, or perhaps a little more, 
near the garrison, on the east side of it, for the purpose of making a gar- 
den. I suppose, by applying to Mr. Ludlow, he will be able to stake off 
three or four lots accordingly. I wish you to give him the necessary di- 
rections. 

I designed to have dispatched Lieutenant Kingsbury for the eastward 
long before this time, but have been prevented for want of a boat, by 
which delay I find it will be impracticable to procure the certificates in 
time for the two sections of land intended to be purchased from you, in 
what is called the College Township. As it is out of my power to comply 
with your last proposals relative to furnishing the certificates, I am never- 
theless willing to agree with your first proposals, which were to pay you 
2 \ 6 specie per acre for the said two sections. The money shall be ready 
for you whenever you please to call for it, as also for the lots for the gar- 
den. An allowance for advancing the ready money ought, in my opinion, 
to be made. I shall expect your answer on the return of Mr. Ludlow. 
I have the honor to be, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 
The Honorable John Cleves Symmes, Esq., 

one of the Judges of the Western Territory, at North Bend. 



Same to General Knox. 

Fort Washington, March 24, 1790. 
Sir — I had the honor to address you last on the 20th ultimo, a dupli- 
cate whereof is now inclosed. 



454 APPENDIX NO. I. 

The Indians still continue to murder and plunder tlie inhabitants ; es- 
pecially the boats going up and down the Ohio river. About the middle 
of this month they broke up Kenton's station, a small settlement fifteen 
miles above Limestone, killing and capturing the whole of the people, 
supposed to be ten or twelve in number. Buckner Thruston, Esq., has 
just arrived here, who informs me of a capital stroke of plunder which 
they made from the boats, one of which he was on board, a small distance 
above the Scioto river. This gentleman is a member of the Virginia 
Legislature, and has given me the inclosed written report of the attack, by 
which you will please to observe that the property captured by the sav- 
ages was estimated at £4,000. He supposes them to have been Shawa- 
nees. No calculation will answer but raising a sufficient force to effectu- 
ally chastise the whole of those nations who are known to be hostile. 

Ensign Francis Luse has given me his resignation, and I now inclose 
his commission, which I hope you will be pleased to accept. I have al- 
lowed him to be run upon the rolls until the first of May next, as he is 
considerably embarrassed in his circumstances. Permit me to recommend 
cadet John Morgan to fill the vacancy, unless there is a probability ot 
promotion for him in the corps of artillery, in which case, and not other- 
wise, I would beg leave particularly to recommend Mr. David Britt to fill 
the vacancy occasioned by the resignation of Mr. Luse, or the first vacancy 
which may happen in future. Mr. Britt was a former partner of Messrs. 
Turnbull, Marmie & Co.; has served as a cadet for some time in the dif- 
ferent grades, from a private sentinel to a non-commissioned officer. He 
has also been of great service to me in many other instances, and is, in 
my opinion, deservedly entitled to preferment. 

I have received no intelligence, as yet, of Major Doughty, but have de- 
tached Lieutenant Armstrong to undertake the business recommended in 
your secret letters. No written orders have been given him upon that 
subject. Be pleased to receive the inclosed monthly returns of the regi- 
ment, dated the 1st February and the 1st of March. 
I have the honor to be, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 



Same to William Govett. 

FoBT Washington, April 4, 1790. 
Dear Sir — I have altered my mind respecting purchasing the certifi- 
cates to pay Judge Symmes for land. You will therefore pay no attention 
to that matter, as I have declared off the intended purchase. 



L E T T E il S . 455 

I am hourly expecting tlie arrival of Lieutenant Denny, by whom I 
shall hope to hear from you. 

I am, dear sir, &c., 

Jos. IIarmar. 



Same to Captain Ziegler. 

Fort WASHiNaTON, April 5, 1790. 
Dear Sir — I have received your several letters of the 18 th February, 
and the 6th, 24th, 26th and 27th ult. 

You did right in sending two men with the contractor's boat, as the 
Indians begin already to be very troublesome on the river near the Scioto. 
The clothing, sheet iron, cartridges and flints all arrived safe. The re- 
mainder of the clothing I shall be expecting when Lieutenant Denny 
arrives. 

Mrs. Harmar joins me in respectful compliments to Mrs. Ziegler and 
Mrs. Heart. Give my compliments to all our New England acquaint- 
ances. I wish their settlement may prosper. We have a delightful situa- 
tion here, and an excellent garrison ] no danger, as there is with you, of 
an inundation. 

I am, dear sir, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

Captain David Ziegleh, commanding officer at Fort Harmar. 



Same to Doctor Wistar. 

Fort Washington, April 5, 1790. 

Dear Sir — It is a long time ago since I received your very agreeable 
letter, acknowledging the receipt of the bones by Captain Armstrong; 
you will please to receive by this conveyance a few more. We are at 
present stationed opposite the mouth of the Licking river, not above 
twenty miles, by land, from the Big Bone Lick creek. I intend shortly 
to let Dr. Allison, the surgeon of the regiment, proceed to that place and 
stay there for about a week. Upon his return I am in hopes to be able 
to send you a proper collection of the bones, and worthy of your accept- 
ance, as the Doctor is curious in those matters. 

The savages begin already to be very troublesome with the boats de- 
scending the Ohio river j nothing will cure them but an effectual chas- 
tisement. I beg you to accept my thanks for your obliging letter and 
shall be happy in hearing from you frequently. 

I am, dear sir, with very great esteem, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 



456 APPEJ^DIXNO.I. 

Same to Win. Govett. 

Fort Washington, June 8, 1700. 

Deau Sir — I have to acknowledge the receipt of jour letter by Lieu- 
tenant Denny, dated the 23d January, inclosing your account current. 

Mr. Leiper's Encyclopedia would not have answered us. I want the 
most elegant edition that can be procured. The thermometer will do. 

The ground rent on Market street lot must be settled with the Univer- 
sity on the best terms you can. I have already written to Colonel Craig 
concerning my small plantation ; consult with him upon the occasion. 

I observe the rent for the Market street house is too much in arrears. 
It is very likely the old lady will shortly be able to pay it; therefore it 
is not my wish to distress her. 

As to selling the G-ermantown ground rent and purchasing the ground 
rent on Market street lot, I leave it entirely to your own judgment, how 
to act for me in this respect. 

The Indians have been, and still are troublesome. I am in full hopes 
that the new government will give me the materials to work with, and 
the next year be prepared for a general war with them. 

Mrs. Harmar writes to Mrs. Govett by this conveyance. 
I am, dear sir, &c., 

Jos. Harmak. 



Same to Joseph Hoicell, Jr. 

Fort Washinotox, June 9, 1790. 

Dear Sir — ^I wrote to you on the 2Sth January last, and inclosed it in 
my letter to the War Office. I am surprised it has not been received. I 
now have to acknowledge your several letters of the 2d, 17th and 31st 
January, and the 28th March, and am extremely obliged to you for your 
care and attention in forwarding me the newspapers. They all came safe 
and regularly to hand. 

Captain Beatty is ju?t now on the wing for Muskingum, and from 
thence to the falls of Beaver and Venango, making a final settlement as 
he goes along, up to the first of the present year. 

I have written to General Knox, -nhy I thought it most advisable for 
him to draw the third instalment, and be done with the business before he 
leaves the country. He will be with you early in September. Lieuten- 
ant Ernest is his successor. There has been a Major J here, for the 

avowed design of speculating upon the necessities of the soldiers and some 
others, but I have prevented them. It is, in my opinion, a most dishon- 
orable traffic ; by God, my han^ls are clear of it, and if I find that any 
officer is concerned in it, he shall be called to a strict and severe account 



LETTEES. 457 

for such unmilit<ary proceedings. The Indians are exceedingly trouble- 
some. I know of nothing that will cure the disorder, but government 
raising an army to effectually chastise thera — all treaties are in vain. 

Mrs. Harmar and my little flock are well. She desires to be affection- 
ately remembered to you. Do not forget writing to me; it will afford me 
great happiness to hear constantly from you. 

Believe me, yours truly, 

Jos. Harmar. 
Joseph Howell, Jr., Esq., Tay-master General, at New York. 



Same to Lieutenant Mattlicxo Ernest. 

Head-Quarters, Fort Washington, June 9, 1790. 

Dear Sir — My last letter was dated the 5th of February, and for- 
warded by Lieutenant Kingsbury, which I observe you have received ; I 
now have to acknowledge the receipt of your several letters, dated the 22d 
and 26th of February, the 20th and 25th of March, and the 13th of May, 
with the different dispatches. The deeds, patents, &c., belonging to me, 
I left with you by Mr. Denny, I wish you to take particular care of and 
keep them safe. You may inform Ephraim Douglas, Esq., that I have 
long since returned all the drafts to council, amongst which was one for 
one hundred dollars drawn upon him, consequently that business is at an 
end. I have no objections to your having lent the arms to Messrs. Wil- 
kins and Blaine, provided they are returned in good order. Mr. Parker 
delivered to me the six old muskets which you lent him. The chief pait 
of the cartridge paper has arrived at head-quarters, the remainder was left 
at Fort Harmar. 

All the officers at this post (agreeably to the list inclosed) are unani- 
mous in their votes for you as Pay-master, and I take it for granted that 
there will not be above three or four votes for Lieutenant Frothingham. 
You are therefore to consider yourself as the new Pay-master to the regi- 
ment, and as soon as possible you are to repair to New York, and there to 
use all your address to prevent old times taking place ; I mean so much 
arrearages being due to the corps. Captain Beatty draws all his instal- 
ments as he goes on, and settles with the troops up to the first of the 
present year. It will therefore be your duty to look out sharp for the 
pay, &c., due from the 1st of January, 1790. As I said before, you 
must use all your address ; indeed, all the graces of Lord Chesterfield will 
be necessary upon this occasion.^ 

1 Ernest was one of the most polished and gentlemanly persons in the army. 



458 APPENDIX NO. I. 

I cannot conclude my letter without assuring you tliat I anj very well 
pleased with your attention and accuracy in forwarding my several dis- 
patches. For the news I refer you to Captain Beatty. 

I am, sir, with very great esteem, your most humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 

Lieutenant Matthew Ernest, commanding officer at Fort Pitt. 

P. S. — Tell the contractors that we have not had an ounce of meat for 
some time, and that the flour and whiskey are just out. 

List of Officers at Fort Washington, June dih, 1790. 

1. General Harmar, 8. Lieutenant Forde, 

2. Captain Ferguson, 9. Lieutenant Pratt, 

3. Captain Strong, 10. Lieutenant Denny, 

4. Captain M' Curdy, 11. Ensign Sedam, 

5. Captain Beatty, 12. Ensign Hartshorn, 

6. Lieutenant Armstrong, 13. Ensign Thompson, 

7. Lieutenant Kerney, 14. Doctor Allison. 



Same to same. 

Fort Washinoton, August 13, 1790. 

Dear Sir — My last letter to you was dated on the 9th June, and for- 
warded by Captain Beatty ; since which I have the pleasure to acknow- 
ledge the receipt of your letters of the 10th and 27th June, with the 
different dispatches, letters, &c., which, together with my private stores, 
all arrived safe, and in good order. In my letter by Beatty, you will ob- 
serve that the officers at this post gave an unanimous vote for you as the 
new Pay-master of the regiment; in consequence of which I ordered you 
to proceed for New York, to use all your address to receive and bring on 
our pay, subsistence, &c., from the first of the present year; but since 
writing that letter, the late Act of Congress for regulating the military 
establishment, has come forward, which totally changes the face of aflFairs, 
and renders those orders of no effect. You are therefore not to go to New 
York. It is more than probable that you will be elected Pay-master to the 
battalion of artillery, in which case Major Doughty will give you the 
necessary orders. 

Lieutenant Denny left with you sundry deeds, patents, &c., &c., of 
lands belonging to me in Westmoreland county. I gave Major Huffnagle 
a power of attorney to transact that business for me j it is revoked, but 
it has not yet been returned. Let me beg you either to undertake this 



LETTERS. 459 

business yourself, or if it is inconvenient, be pleased to inform me of some 
gentleman in Pittsburgh or its vicinity, who is willing to receive a power 
of attorney for this purpose, and will pay proper attention to my interest. 
I have thought of young Mr. Woods, but know not whether he would be 
inclined to undertake it. The lands are certainly valuable. 

The old public stores have not yet arrived at head-quarters from Fort 
Pitt. 

As for news, all hopes of peace with the savages in this quarter and on 
the Wabash, are at an end. We are preparing to carry on an expedition 
against them this fall, in conjunction with the Kentucky militia. 
I am, dear sir, &c., 

Jos. IIarmar. 

P. S. — I am much obliged to you for forwarding the bones to Doctor 
Wistar. 



Same to Eit/as Putnam. 

Fort Washington, September 2, 1790. 
Sir — I have had the pleasure of receiving your letter of the 22d June 
last, wherein you are pleased to make me an offer, and my friends also, 
to become adventurers in as many shares as we may choose, in company 
with you, in the Scioto speculation. I am much obliged to you for the 
offer, but matters are so circumstanced with me at present that I must de- 
cline accepting it. You may be assured, sir, that I shall afford the Euro- 
pean emigrants every assistance and protection in my power, consistent 
(vith my duty, and agreeably to the orders I may receive upon that head. 
Be pleased to make my most respectful compliments to all my friends 
it Marietta; and believe me to be, with much esteem, 
Sir, your very, &c., 



Jos. Harmar. 



The Honorable Rufus Putnam, at Marietta. 



Same to Major MamtramcTc. 

Fort Washington, September 3, 1790. 
Dear Sir — The information you gave me, that a plan was certainly 
on foot to assemble a number of nations at the Miami village (as soon as 
the corn will be ripe), in order to pay me a visit, I am obliged to you fur; 
perhaps we may be beforehand with them. If you should be so fortunate 
as to make a successful stroke, either at the Ouiatauon, Vermilion or 



460 APPENDIX NO. I. 

L'Anguule, circumstances may render it necessary that you should in- 
stantly return to the post instead of remaining in the country, which I 
shall leave to your own judgment ; but at all events, endeavor to let me hear 
from you verbally, by a trusty Frenchman or some other person. You 
acted very right in dismissing those scoundrels, the Pottawattamies and 
Weeas, who came into you with their usual professions of peace, without 
giving them any goods. I suppose they came for nothing but in expect- 
ation of receiving some presents. The substance of Mr. Tardiveau's let- 
ter which you inclose me, I observe is a request to you to send him a de- 
tachment of troops from Post Vincennes for the security of the Illinois 
country. This is utterly impracticable at present, and we must have more 
troops before it can be any way practicable in future. I hope you have 
perfectly recovered your health. Major Sargent left me yesterday; ho 
writes to you by this conveyance. It will be proper that you take into 
the field with you, a brass three-pounder, and I place the fullest confidence 
ia your abilities, as what we are going to undertake is a serious affair. 
I take it for granted that there is not the least relaxation from your for- 
mer rigid discipline. If any ofi&cer should prove refractory, arrest him 
instantly. You will find that I shall always effectually support you in 
maintaining the strictest subordination. I am indeed very sorry to hear 
of the distressing situation you have been in with respect to provisions, 
but by this time Mr. Elliott will certainly have forwarded a sufficiency ; 
say two months' provisions for five hundred men. I have not yet heard 
from the Pennsylvania militia, nor received any late accounts from Ken- 
tucky ; but report says they are determined to turn out spiritedly upon the 
occasion. 

I am, &c., Jos. Harmar. 

Major J. F. Hamtramck, comraanding officer at Fort Knox, Post Vincennes. 

P. S. — We have heard that you have entered the matrimonial state. 
Mrs. Harmar and myself wish you every happiness in it. You will please 
to present our kind compliments to Mrs. Hamtramck, and accept them 
yourself likewise. 



Same to General Mifflin. 

Fort Wasuinton, September 4, 1790. 
Mt dear General — I did myself the honor to write you a few lines by 
Lieutenant Kingsbury, since which Lieutenant Denny has handed me your 
letter of the 23d January. I am much obliged to you for the attention 
paid in delivering Lieutenant Denny orders for the several sums stated by 
me to be due to him and other ofiicers for recruitino; services for which 



LETTERS. 461 

they have received payment. The official letter from the Secretary at 
Council, giving me proper credit for the returned orders on the treasurers 
of Westmoreland, Fayette and Washington, has been also received, which 
is very satisfactory, as it settles all public accounts which the State of 
Pennsylvania had against me. I am preparing for an expedition against 
the savages, to go forward the first of next month. Our regular force is 
but small; there is a prosjiect of being joined by a considerable body of 
militia, who I hope will frtick to the text, and not leave me in the lurch. 
Believe me dear General, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 
His Excellency Thomas Mifflin, at Philadelphia. 



Lieutenant Denny to General Harmar. 

Philadelphia, March 9, 1791. 

Dear General — The great people here have at length determined to 
carry on another campaign against the savages upon a more extensive plan 
than the last. In the meantime they have thought it necessary to order a 
temporary expedition, entirely of militia, for the purpose of amusing tho 
Indians and to prevent them from committing any further depredations on 
the frontiers. Mr. Brown, of Congress, is furnished with ten thousand 
dollars for this business. G. K. took up so much time in forming his re- 
port for Congress, and both bouses debated so long upon it, that I am 
doubtful whether men can be enlisted for the grand object and marched 
over the mountains in season ; the encouragement will not be sufficient, 
though six dollars bounty is to be given. I was in hopes that when these 
military arrangements were all settled, that G. K. would dispatch me for 
head-quarters, but I am now afraid he means to detain me to recruit. 
Armstrong has received his instructions and began this day — Beatty and 
myself are yet waiting in suspense. I wish most sincerely to be with you, 
for I am perfectly sick of the court and all courtiers. 

Captain Beatty writes to you by this conveyance, and incloses the mili- 
tary establishment, by which you will find that Major is appointed 

Lieut.-Col. commanding of the second regiment. Some reasons which 
will operate very forcibly upon him, make me think that it is uncertain 
whether he will accept or not. Some people are troubled with the cannon 
fever, and if I was not much mistaken, he was very subject to it — a feather 
bed would be a fitter place than the field. The Governor being appointed 
to command the army this summer, I hope you will be reconciled, I am 
very confident that no other man would be submitted to ; but the long 
friendship which has subsisted between you both, and his commission ex- 



462 APPENDIX NO. I. ^ 

piring at the end of the campaign, as I am informed it does, will make it 
more easy. Believe me, he has been a sound friend when you greatly stood 
m need of one, and 

I am, dear General, your obedient 

E. Denny. 

Brigadier-General Harmar, 

Head-Quarters, Oliio river. 



Same to same. 

Pittsburgh, June 1, 1792. 
Dear Sir — TVe have alarms here hourly. The savages begin to show 
themselves. The settlements north of the old Pennsylvania road are all 
abandoned and the people fled across the Monongahela. Myers' and M'- 
Nair's, and along there, are frontiers. Several circumstances seem to com- 
bine to frighten the people here and cause them to dread a stroke. They 
have a Frenchman confined in jail, suspected for being a spy; indeed he 
has acknowledged that he was sent to gain information of the strength of 
the town, and had his orders from Colonel Butler, of Niagara. He has 
also confessed that two men of this place were concerned with him, one 
of them a confidential character in public service, the other is Tom Grirty. 
You may have seen by the papers, that Jeffers had a kind of independent 
command of friendly Indians and rifle men. AYe heard yesterday fcom 
Venango that several of these friendly Indians had in a formal manner 
delivered up to Captain Cass, the commandant there, their rifles, and had 
declared that they intended joining against us. This circumstance is not 
very favorable. You will suppose that I have very early hark'd in with 
the people, but it was always my opinion that fifty bold fellows might set 
the town on fire and retire without any loss, and I am very certain it could 
now be done with ease. As to the soldiers here, though there are fifty, I 
would not give them their half gill a day for all their services, unless it is 
that perhaps the appearance of them may deter the enemy from making 
an attempt ; for should an attack be made, the utmost they could do would 
be to defend the stockade fort where they are quartered. The militia are 
really tolerably well employed. A strong guard mounts every evening, 
from which there are constant patrols all night; besides they are frequent- 
ly out on scouts for one, two and three days at a stretch. The people 
wonder the soldiers don't come out. The present protection appears not 
to be sufficient. The State troops are under no subordination, and it is a 
question whether they render as much service as they might. Should you 



LETTERS. 4fS3' 

see Governor Mifflin, please to offer my respects. My kind compliments 
to Mrs. Harmar, and believe me, 

Yours, &c.. 



General IIarmar, Philadelphia. 



E. Denny. 



General Harmar to Peter Audrain. 

Philadelphia, July 12, 1792. 
Dear Sir — I bave had the pleasure to receive your letter of the 22d 
ultimo, per post. The gentleman whom General Gibson informed you 
that he dined in company with at my house, was Monsieur Peyroux, the 
commandant at St, Genevieve. He does not leave this city for sometime ; 
but when he does, it will afford me peculiar happiness to be in any way 
instrumental in serving you ; your name shall therefore be mentioned to 
him, and I will give him an introductory letter to you before he sets out 
for Pittsburgh. 

I shall remember you to the French Ambassador when I see him. Be 
pleased to present my best respects to all our good friends in Pittsburgh, 
and believe me to be, with great esteem. 

Yours, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 

Mr. Peter Audrain, Merchant, Pittsburgh. 



Same to Ehcnezer Denny. 

Philadelphia, September 6, 1792. 
Dear Sir — Your two letters of the 1st June and the 30th July, have 
been duly received, by which I am happy to learn your success in trade. 
The loss of Hardin and Trueman I sincerely regret, particularly the for- 
mer. Murdering of flags does not seem to indicate a speedy peace with 
the savages. I have conversed with Major Asheton relative to the settle- 
ment at Presqu' Isle, but we are not yet sufEciently informed on that sub- 
ject. I am rather inclined to think that I shall not become an adventurer 
in it. 

I shall not forget to remember you to Governor Mifflin, and hope some- 
thing may turn up to your advantage through his means. You wish to 
know the price of stocks. They tell me six per cents bring 22f. cash. Mrs. 
H. sends her compliments to you. Our friend Ernest will deliver you 
this letter ; and believe me to be, 

Your friend and humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 

Mr. Ebekezer Denny, Pittsburgh, 



464 APPENDIX NO. I. 

E. Denny to General Harmar. 

Pittsburgh, January 5, 1793. 
Dear Sir — I have just time to write a few lines by a very particular 
and one of my most intimate friends at this place, John Woods, Esq. 
Any civilities which may be shown him will lay me under new obligations. 
He has a short letter from me to Governor MiiBin on the subject of militia 
appointments. I hope that you will be the adjutant-general. Respects 
to Mrs. Harmar, and believe me, dear sir, 

Your faithful, 

E. Denny. 



General Harmar to E. Denny. 

Philadelphia, February 8, 1793. 
Dear Sir — I have the pleasure to acknowledge the receipt of your two 
letters, the one dated the 22d December last, the other on the 5th ultimo. 
I am very sorry for the loss of Stephen, ^ as by all accounts he was a faith- 
ful, honest lad. As for the Population Society, and the Presqu' Isle plan, 
I have no great opinion of it, and therefore choose to decline it altogether. 
You may depend upon it, what influence I have with the Governor shall 
be exerted to serve you upon the militia establishment. Mrs. Harmar 
sends you her respectful compliments. 

I am, dear sir, with very great esteem and regard. 
Your affectionate friend, 

Jos. Harmar. 



E. Denny to General Harmar. 

Pittsburgh, February 22, 1793. 
Dear Sir — I feel myself much obliged by your flattering assurances. 
The militia establishment — I hope it may please you and be the cause of 
a visit to this country ; it will add to your health and enable you to attend 
personally to your private concerns. My afi'ectionate reppects to Mrs. 
Harmar, and believe me to be, dear sir. 

With the highest esteem and regard, &c., 

E. Denny. 

General Harmar, Philadelphia. 



General Harmar to Governor Horcell. 

Philadklphia, August 20, 1793. 
Dear Sir — With great pleasure I received your friendly letter of the 

1 Major Denny's servant during his Indian campaigns. 



LETTERS. 465 

9th instant. To hear from an old soldier, for whom I have a particular 
regard, was highly gratifying to me. I live in a small house in Eighth street ; 
when you arrive in this city, I shall do myself the honor to wait upon 
you and give you soldierly fare. Sorry I am indeed, that it is out of my 
power at present to accept of your polite invitation to visit you at Tren- 
ton — being so much busied with the militia business prevents it. You 
are desirous of having one thousand copies of the Baron Steuben's Ma- 
noeuvres, printed on good paper, with well executed plates, procured at a 
reasonable rate, to be bound with your militia law. I have made the ne- 
cessary inquiry, and inclose you the proposals of Mr. Cist, a printer here 
which, if they meet with your approbation, shall be cheerfully attended 
to on my part. The edition has had the sanction of the War Office, con- 
sequently must suppose it to be correct. You will be pleased to receive 
the inclosed militia law of this State — the plates have been struck but 
are not annexed to the instructions ; perhaps you would wish to go to no 
more expense than they have done, if so, let me know. 

I have the honor to be, dear sir, with every sentiment of friendship 
and regard, 

Yours, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 
His Excellency Richard Howell, Esq., 

Governor of the State of New Jersey. 



Same to Ebenezer Denny. 

Philadelphia, November 23, 1793. 
Dear Sir — It was not until the 20th instant that I had the pleasure 
of receiving your two letters of the 13th September and 11th October 
last. That the treaty did not succeed, does not at all surprise me; I 
never was of the opinion that it would. If General Wayne should bo 
unsuccessful with his army (which I sincerely hope may not be the case), 
the frontier settlements on the Ohio must be left in a wretched exposed 
situation. The consequence would be dreadful indeed. It is to be la- 
mented that government has not long since established a post at Presqu' 
Isle, as it is most undoubtedly a very eligible position to prevent an inter- 
course between the Six Nations and the western Indians, and at the same 
time secure their trade and friendship, and encourage settlements upon the 
lands of the State on Lake Erie. I have conversed with the Governor, 
and showed him your letters upon this subject, but his reply was, that to 
establish a post there is an object that should come under the notice of 
30 



466 APPENDIX NO. I. 

the general government; therefore, my friend, your expectations of a 
command there are fruitless, which I am sorry for. 

The direful contagion which has been so long prevalent in this city, has 
now entirely ceased. You may venture to come down with perfect safety. 
It is supposed that from the 1st August to the 10th November, about five 
thousand persons have died, but certainly not altogether with this malig- 
nant disorder. If Colonel Neville should resign his brigade-inspectorship, 
it is probable you may fill that office; hut kissing goes hy favor. lean 
promise nothing, only that, by the Lord, you shall have my interest for it. 
Mrs. Harmar joins me in congratulating you on your matrimonial con- 
nexion, and believe me to be, dear sir, with great esteem and regard. 

Your friend, &c., 

Jos. Harmar. 



Governor Mifflin to Captain E. Denny. 

Philadelphia, March 1, 1794. 
Sir — Inclosed you will receive a copy of an Act of the Gleneral Assem- 
bly, entitled "An act for more effectually securing the trade, peace and 
safety of the port of Philadelphia, and defending the western frontiers of 
the Commonwoalth;" a commission by which you are appointed captain of 
the Allegheny company ; a sketch of the appointments and arrangements 
of all the companies directed to be raised, and a copy of an act, entitled 
"An act for laying out a town at Presqu' Isle." You will be pleased, sir, 
to take all lawful measures, under the instructions of the brigade-inspector 
of the county, and with the aid of the officers of your company, for en- 
gaging, during the term, and for the pay prescribed by the act for the de- 
fense of our frontiers, four sergeants, four corporals, one drummer and 
fifer, or two buglers, and sixty-five rank and file, or privates. In making 
your enlistments, you will stipulate with the men, that, if the state of the 
war on the frontiers shall, in my judgment, require their continuance in 
the service of the Commonwealth, after the expiration of the term of 
eight months mentioned in the law, they shall continue accordingly until 
the meeting of the Legislature next ensuing the expiration of the last 
term, for any shorter period that I may direct. From the sketch of the 
appointments and arrangements of the several companies, you will perceive 
that you are called on to command the detachment which is made, in or- 
der to carry into effect the act entitled "An act for laying out the town 
of Presqu' Islej" and the importance of the object, as well as the 
difficulties -that may attend its accomplishment, will evince the confidence 



LETTERS. 467 

that is reposed in your zeal, spirit and prudence. In the discbarge of your 
trust, I am persuaded you will pay a due respect to the design and spirit 
of the laws I have communicated to you ; and therefore, I shall content 
myself with suggesting the following general regulations : 

1st. Messrs. Irvine, EUicottand Gallatin, the commissioners who arc 
employed to lay out the town at Presqu' Isle, will probably be engaged 
in that duty early in the month of May next. It will be necessary, there- 
fore, that before that time arrangements should be made for establishing 
some post for protection and defense in the neighborhood of Presqu' Isle ; 
and the commissioners have thought that a spot at Le Boeuf will be the 
most eligible and convenient for their undertaking. The lieutenant who 
is detached from the artillery company, will transport thither, under the 
convoy of his detachment, a competent supply of provisions, cannon, arms, 
ammunition and camp equipage. Of these articles, an officer in the na- 
ture of quarter-master will have the immediate custody ; but they are, 
nevertheless, to be considered as being under your superintending care 
and disposition, to be preserved with the greatest caution ; not to be used 
but in cases of necessity, and to be accounted for by you, to any person 
who may be appointed to succeed you in command, or who may be author- 
ized to receive the same when the purposes of the post shall be attained. 
You will be pleased to strengthen the detachment of artillery by a party 
of inftintry under your command, whenever they advance from Pittsburgh; 
and this party should consist, I think, of not less than a sergeant and 
fifteen men, or if circumstances will admit, of an officer and twenty men. 

2d. As the object of the detachment under your command is to carry 
the act for establishing a town at Presqu' Isle into eflFect, you shall deem 
it your duty to comply with every lawful request of the commissioners ; 
in stationing the men in such numbers and at such places, as they shall 
from time to time think requisite to insure their safety and defense, and 
generally in aiding and facilitating their measures by all means in your 
power. 

3d. The Legislature having made provision for surveying and opening 
the roads, one from Reading and the other from French creek to Presqu' 
Isle, it is obvious that the establishment of the town is intimately con- 
nected with those objects; and therefore you should deem it your duty to 
grant all the aid and protection to the respective commissioners and con- 
tractors employed in surveying and opening these roads, that is compatible 
with a due attention to the particular charge which is confided to you. 

4th. In the present state of our northern frontier, you will deem it a 
duty peculiarly incumbent upon you, to avoid giving any occasion of of- 
fense to the peaceable Indians or to the British garrisons which are in that 



468 APPENDIX NO. I. 

quarter. You. will endeavor, in case any intercourse should necessarily or 
accidentally take place with them, to conciliate and cultivate a good and 
friendly understanding; and you are, above all things, to remember that 
the objects of your appointment are strictly those of protection and de- 
fense, and that any act of aggression or hostility committed against any 
person or persons in amity with the United States, or committed against 
any person or persons whomsoever, out of the jurisdiction of Pennsylva- 
nia, will be unauthorized and punished according to law. 

5th. For the purposes of information, you will keep a journal of your 
proceedings, and maintain a regular correspondence as well with the com- 
missioners appointed to lay out the town of Presqu' Isle as with the 
brigade-inspector of Allegheny county ; and when any matter of public 
importance shall occur, you will, with all possible dispatch, communicate 
the same to me. 

To these regulations it is perhaps unnecessary to add that it is expected 
that you will give the strictest attention to the health, order and discipline 
of the detachment under your command ; and in all things so act as to 
justify the confidence which your country has reposed in you. 

Thomas Mifflin. 
To Eeenezer Denny, Esq., 

Captain of the Allegheny company, &c. 



Ca_ptain Denny to Governor Mifflin. 

PiTTSBURaH, April 25, 1794. 

Sir — I had the honor of writing to you by the last post, mentioning 
the necessity we were under of calling out a few militia in order to take 
advantage of the rivers, while up. I then could not calculate with any 
certainty what time the detachments from other counties would arrive; 
however, the greatest part of them came in time to join the volunteers. 
They marched on Monday last and encamped the first night twenty-one 
miles from here, on the route to Fort Franklin, and in all probability 
would reach that place yesterday. Ensign Mehaffy, from Westmoreland, 
had the direction of the State troops, two sergeants, two corporals and 
forty-three privates; the volunteers consisted of a captain, lieutenant, 
thirty men ; total, one captain, one lieutenant, one ensign and seventy- 
seven men. They will go no farther than Le Boeuf. 

I have not such confidence in the Six Nations as to think they will favor 
the establishment ; and a small party subject to the power of a few ill- 
disposed Indians, would be more liable to be stopped by them ; not that I 
think they will offer any violence immediately, but I think they will throw 



LETTERS. 469 

some objections in the way j perhaps desire the business postponed for 
a while. We have certain information that the chiefs were lately assem- 
bled in council at the mouth of Buffalo. Their meetings there have always 
been influenced by British agents, and I should not be surprised to find 
them return with a wish to prevent the settlement at Presqu' Isle. I have 
received letters from the inspectors of "Washington and Westmoreland 
counties, informing me of the orders they had from you, telling me that 
whatever reinforcements we requii-ed might be depended on. Doctor 
Wilkins is gone in company with the party to Le Boeuf. I have requested 
him, and directed Mehaffy, to write to me by every opportunity ; and 
should anything material be discovered, to send off an express. 
I am, with respect, &c., 

Ebenezer Denny, Captain 



Same to same. 

Pittsburgh, May 2, 1704. 

Sir — I had the honor to address you on the 25th ultimo, since which 
nothing material has happened. The party sent forward to establish a 
post of protection and defense at Le Boeuf, consisted of a captain, lieu- 
tenant and thirty volunteers, and an ensign and forty-seven of the State 
troops ; they were at Fort Franklin on the 24th, as expected. A very 
seasonable rain, which fell while they were on the march to this post, will 
(provided the way is open) enable the contractor to push all the provisions 
and stores up the creek without loss of time. We are not without appre- 
hensions that this council-holding between the chiefs of the Six Nations 
and the British, at the mouth of Buffalo creek, may terminate unfavorably 
to our establishment. The Cornplanter is not with them ; but I am told 
that he has ordered away the traders who had stores in his town. Before 
our detachment proceeds farther than Mead's settlement, the disposition 
of the Indians will be known ; and in case any opposition is offered, the 
party will halt and secure themselves and the stores until a suflUcicnt rein- 
forcement joins them. I depend upon Doctor Wilkins' and Ensign Me- 
haffy's earliest notice. Lieutenant Murphy and Ensign Patterson have 
been about three weeks away endeavoring to find men for the Allegheny 
company. Patterson has been tolerably successful ; 3Iurphy I have not 
heard from ; he is in Fayette county. They must both be here in a few 
days now. No doubt but you have been informed of the death of Lieu- 
tenant Hazlewood ; his men will reach this perhaps in six days. 

I acknowledge the honor of your letter of the 25th April. The delays 
which took place in sending on the men from the other counties, the in- 



470 APPENDIX NO. I. 

spector took pains to account for, and I am in hopes there will be no ill 
consequences. The inspectors are all desirous to promote the establish- 
ment of Presqu' Isle, and have informed me of their orders from the 

Governor. 

E. Denny. 



Sa7ne to same. 

Fort Franklin, June 14, 1794. 

Sir — I have the honor of acknowledging your two letters, dated the 
9th and 11th instant; after receiving the first, we concluded it would be 
best to proceed on our march. We arrived here the day before yesterday; 
all well. The account of Ransom's people being killed was too true, but 
by what nation of Indians is yet doubtful. Mr. Ellicott and Mr. Wil- 
kins have written and sent two runners for the Cornplanter, and they have 
requested me to wait the return of the express ; when they arrive you will 
be informed of the success of the message. I am suspicious the old fel- 
low will not show himself. The fact is, that the Indians about here, from 
twenty downward, for some time past have been exceedingly insolent, 
treating the officers, the fort and every person about it, with the utmost 
contempt ; but since our arrival they have altered their tune, so say Lieu- 
tenant Polhemus and Doctor M'Cray. We have written to Le Boeuf and 
gave the officer there a caution. The day after to-morrow the runner is to 
be back. Van Horn and Bales, the two men who brought your last letter, 
saw one Indian at the plain, about twenty miles this side of Pittsburgh, 
and the trace of sis or seven. 

June IQth. — Yours inclosing a copy of Polhemus' came yesterday. 
The Cornplauter's nephew arrived from the towns about the same time. 
He delivered a long speech from his uncle to Lieutenant Polhemus. Upon 
summing up the whole, we have not a shadow of doubt but that a plan 
was formed to destroy all the posts and settlements in this quarter. It was 
all done upon the strength or prospect of a war between the British 

and • fJiat subsiding, the other, I am in hopes, has also. There 

is no doubt but the English will urge them to join the western Indians, 
and have done every thing possible, and perhaps a few may ; but I rather 
think that unless we have a war with them, we'll have none with the Sis 
Nati^ons generally. 

The Cornplanter has gone to another council at Buffalo ; he set out the 
same time the nephew started for this place, and will return in about ten 
days. He says he is very sorry for the mischief done lately, and is ex- 
tremely concerned at the account given of their going to take up the 



LETTEKS. 471 

hatchet ; says they are bad men who reported it ; that it's a lie, and insists 
upon knowing whom the information came from. It is evident that a 
stroke was meditated, but now perhaps dropped. Every apology which 
he can possibly make won't be sufficient to clear him of the imputation 
of a traitor. Some of the nation say that the English have bought 0'- 
Beal. We shall spend two days to come, in helping Mr. Polhemus to put 
his garrison in some state of defense ; for should anything happen it, we 
should fare the worse above. 

I have the honor, &c., 

E. Denny. 



Sam,e to Major- General Gibson. 

Fort Le Bceuf, June 27, 1794. 
Dear Sir — Inclosed you will receive a copy of a message brought me 
by a deputation of chiefs and warriors sent for that purpose, from the Six 
Nations, and also our reply. You will perceive by the message that the 
Indians are disposed to have us pushed back ; and if we don't leave the 
country they are to consider us as no friends. I don't apprehend much 
danger here as long as we can keep our men together ; but at present, a 
number of the people who were on before me are ill with the flux ; and 
the working parties which we are necessarily obliged to have at some dis- 
tance, together with two escorts, one sent to Franklin with pack horses, 
the other somewhere between here and Cussewago, with boats, reduces our 
force considerably. Doctor Wilkins^ has made a requisition for ten or 
twelve men to be sent to Pitt, to guard a drove of cattle on to this place. 
From the present appearances it would be very improper to detach so 
many men from my command ; I am, therefore, here under the necessity 
of begging a few militia for that purpose ; they will be wanted about the 
first week in the next month. Indeed, at this particular juncture, I don't 
think a company would be too many to assist us in having the supplies 
brought forward. The people of Cussewago wished for a guard of my 
men ; I could not spare them yet ; the consequences, I am afraid, will be 
a total evacuation of that settlement. If you should think proper to send 
on a company, a part posted at Mead's will answer a double purpose ; 
there the contractor has a deposit, and it serves our people as an interme- 
, diate post between Franklin and this place, which ought to be by all 
means, supported. You promised you would not neglect us. 

E. Denny. 

1 Sinco better known as General John Wilkins. 



472 APPENDIX NO. I. 

Same to Governor Mifflin. 

Fort Le Bceuf, June 29, 1794. 

The route from Franklin to Le Bceuf, by way of Cussewago, is not less 
than sixty miles. The first part may be made good, but the other will be 
very difficult. A straight road from Franklin to Lo Boeuf won't exceed 
forty-five miles; but it is yet uncertain what kind of road this country 
will aff'ord. 

We would be much better of a surgeon ; many of the men who were 
on here, are lying bad with the flux. However, we are doing every thing 
possible to get them on foot. Constant salt provisions, and not the least 
attention paid to cleanliness, has caused it to spread. Our fresh meat, 
with the little knowledge we have of medicine, has already had a good 
effect. The evening of our arrival here I received the inclosed letter from 
Israel Chapin, superintendent for the Six Nations. The next day, by the 
time mentioned, he and the Indians arrived. They expected to meet us at 
Presqu' Isle. They came from the mouth of Buffalo there, in a row boat. 
Next morning we met and received their message, a copy of which, togeth- 
er with our reply, is also inclosed. William Johnson, who is mentioned 
in the message, is a British agent ; he acted slily as prompter to the chiefs. 
They denied having sold their country ; told us that the paper (deed) 
which they signed at Fort Hr.rmar, was thought by them then to be noth- 
ing but a treaty of peace, and that the goods which were delivered them 
they considered as presents. Money, they say, they received none. The 
line which they had marked upon their map began at O'Beal's town, and 
in a direct line crossed French creek just below Mead's, and on the head 
of Cuyahoga ; from thence to the Muskingum, and down the Ohio and to 
its mouth, and up the Mississippi, leaving a small square for a trading 
house at the mouths of the rivers, and one where Clarksville now is. The 
fello\ys were very inquisitive to know if any surveyors were out, and told 
us to stop every person going toward the lake. They will expect an an- 
swer from our great council. 

I would just remark, that in case of a war, it will be very difficult keep- 
ing either horses or cattle about the place, and impossible to get any sup- 
plies, being so near their towns, unless we have three times the number 
of men which we now have, and establish several intermediate posts. I 
have the honor to inclose a return of the troops, and am with perfect re- 
spect, sir, 

Your most obedient servant, 

E. Denny. 



LETTERS. 473 

General Harmar to Governor Mlffiin. 

December 20, 179G. 
Dear Governor — Be pleased to receive the inclosed letter from Cap- 
tain Denny. He informs me that there is reason to expect several new 
counties will be laid off to the westward of Pittsburgh, this winter, in 
which case he has solicited my influence to interest myself with you in his 
behalf. The commission of prothonotary, with the recorder's office attach- 
ed, would answer his wishes. If those new counties should be laid off, I 
beg leave in a particular manner, to recommend Captain Denny, as a man 
of honor and probity, and capable of filling such an office. Your Excellency 
will add to the numerous obligations already conferred upon me, by taking 
Captain Denny's application under your earliest notice, and securing one 
of those offices for him. 

I have the honor to be, &c., 

Jos. Harmar 



Same to Ehenezer Denny. 

Harmar's Retreat, December 27, 1796. 
Dear Sir — I have been favored with yours of the 5th instant, wherein 
I observe it is your wish to be appointed prothonotary and recorder to one 
of the new counties expected to be laid off this winter, to the west of 
Pittsburgh. An inflammation on my leg has confined me at home for 
this sometime past, which has prevented my visiting Philadelphia as usual; 
but immediately upon the receipt of yours, I wrote a letter to the Governor 
in your behalf, a copy whereof I now inclose you. In a few days I shall 
be able to repair to the city, when you may depend upon it, your applica- 
tion shall receive personally all the support in my power to give it, and sin- 
cerely hope it may be attended with the desired success. Let me know 
whether I shall send you a power of attorney to transact the business 
respecting my lands in Westmoreland. As you are well acquainted with 
those landed matters, I wish very much that you would undertake it, and 
pray do not let any of my lands be sold for payment of the taxes. By 
the next conveyance I shall send you a particular description of all of 
them. Mrs. Harmar joins me in best respects to Mrs. Denny and your- 
self, and believe me to be, with true regard. 

Your friend and humble servant, 

Jos. Harmar. 



474 APPENDIX NO. I. 

Ca2)taiii Denny to General Harmar. 

Pittsburgh, May 5, 1797. 

Dear Sir — I was liappy to hear of your recovery. Our friend Ernest 
is about to leave us, with his family, for Detroit -, we in a particular man- 
ner will feel the loss ; but it must be so. The difficulty of living at this 
place on account of the very high price of provisions, will oblige a num- 
ber to remove. Instance, butter 2/6 current ; indifferent beef 9d., and 
bacon 1/6, and every other article nearly in proportion, and all for cash, 
and a scarcity of the whole. This extraordinary change can easily be ac- 
counted for — but there is no remedy ; time will perhaps regulate things, 
at present there is nothing to be done. 

Grovernor St. Clair has been for some time past at his place not expect- 
ed to live, but I have heard to-day that he is recovering once more. Mrs. 
Denny joins me in best respects to Mrs. Harmar and yourself, and believe 
me to be, with affectionate regard, 

Yours, &c., 

E. Denny. 

General Harmar, near Philadelphia. 



Same to same. 

Pittsburgh, December 14, 1797. 
Dear Sir — Several candidates for office in the new counties have start- 
ed up lately. Robert Galbraith, States Attorney here, and George Thomp- 
son, one of our associate judges, are both aiming for what I applied for 
last winter. John Woods, Senator, has told me that his influence is 
promised to them — he would serve me, but they must be served first. 
Esquire Wallace and Captain Herron, our Representatives, are my partic- 
ular friends — Wallace will interest himself more than the other two. He 
is equally the friend of Thompson, at least I think he would be glad to 
serve us both. I should like very well if Thompson could be provided 
for along with myself. We regard his family, and he stands in as much 
need as I do. 

Yours, &c., 

E. Denny. 



Same to same. 

Pittsburgh. December 20, 1799. 
Dear Sir — I was sorry to hear by Mrs. Harmar's letter of the 8th, 
that your indisposition rendered you unable to write. I am not certain 



LETTERS. 475 

if you have any land in this county other than your State donation, and 
that is not taxable. There are several tracts near a creek called Puckety, 
which empties into the Allegheny river eighteen miles above this, in 
Plum township, that has been returned for several years past in your 
name, but since I have been commissioner, have entered them in the 
name of Jenkins' heirs ; I think they are a part of Mr. Kcnley's division 
of the estate ; but you must know best. I wish you would inform me ; 
at any rate, while I am in office there shall be none sold that you can 
have any possible claim to. What lies in Westmoreland county, or the 
Western Territory, is entirely out of our reach. 

I did expect to see you this fall, but was obliged to be abroad the 
months of August and September last, after which found it necessary to 
be at home. Ernest was in from Detroit in July. Mrs. Denny accom- 
panied him back. They rode to Presqu' Isle, got on board a sloop and 
had a passage of twenty-seven days — stormy weather in August. They 
were beat back to Presqu' Isle twice, and and over to the English shore, 
where they got shelter. I left home a month after they did, was at 
Presqu' Isle in four days and a half. There was no vessel for Detroit ; 
shipped myself for Fort Erie, got down in a day and a night ; engaged a 
passage to Detroit in- a British sloop ready to sail in two days; in the 
meantime procured a horse, rode eighteen miles down Niagara river to the 
Falls, where I spent part of one day. Returned back to Fort Erie the 
evening of the second day ; got on board that night, weighed anchor and 
had a pleasant passage in five days up to Detroit. I intended coming off 
in the first vessel, but Ernest and Mrs. D. had been there but a few days 
before me. Colonel Strong commands there. He and the old woman are 
so fat you would scarcely know either — rolling about in nothing. We 
were treated very politely by the old couple. I was much disappointed in 
the place. It is filthy beyond measure — calculated to accommodate a few 
traders. A square of about three hundred by four hundred yards divided 
by narrow street, one only that a cart can turn about in, and the lots no 
larger than sufficient for a tolerable house to stand on. One or two houses 
excepted, they resemble the buildings at Vincennes — pickets round the 
whole. There is a small regular work back of the town, but it is lost to 
appearance, and covers only the side next itself. It seems to have been 
designed for a retreat for the commanding officer. They say there is a 
covered way to it from what is called the citadel. This last place is noth- 
ing more than the barracks and small parade within the town square, 
separated from the dwellings by pickets. There is a great quantity of 
goods taken to Detroit yearly, but no trade there — it is made a place of 
deposit ; deputy traders, who go out into the Indian country, are fitted off 



476 appendix:n^o.i. 

from thence. The plan answered the first intention. The traders jammed 
up together, in order to fence in the whole and keep out drunken Indians 
The place is crowded at present, and not an inch of ground to extend their 
buildings. I staid ten days. We got on board a vessel bound to Fort 
Erie (where the goods are stored that come round the Falls). The cap- 
tain promised to touch at Presqu' Isle and land us. The first day we 
dropped down the river and came to anchor at a new town the British are 
building at its mouth, eighteen miles below Detroit. We had time to go 
ashore a while. They are making this place vei-y strong; it commands 
the river. When the wind sprung up we got under way and into the lake 
with daylight, and next evening before sunset we were ashore at Presqu' 
Isle — about twenty-four hours pleasant sailing. 

It is rare that both shores of Lake Erie can be seen at the same time. 
Land lies very low, and is not discovered until within four or five leagues. 
Our shore is high, and the bank for the most part is ninety feet. The 
land rises gradually for five miles back. The British, in a few years, 
will have their shore settled from one end to the other. They give the 
land to people who are sick of a democratic government. A great many 
Germans have settled there from Pennsylvania. Upper Canada is now 
very strong. The inhabitants like the government; no taxes but for 
repairing roads and bridges. 

But this "report" is so lengthy, that I think I see you throw it to 
Charles or Eliza. [Here a piece of the letter is torn oif.] I wanted to 
let Mrs. H. know what sailors, &c., we are. 

I must inform you, further, that Colonel Hamtramck has been here 
since September. You know he married again; his wife is at Fort 
Wayne. He is about as broad as he is long. Our Colonels, as they were 
advanced in the army, seemed to have been better furnished ; they look 
like men who have received an additional allowance ; they are both much 
the shape and figure of Pratt. I saw Kingsbury this summer on his way to 
Connecticut. He was very anxious to see you, but he was afraid to go to 
Philadelphia. He had been disappointed in a furlough, and thought if 
he made his appearance he would be ordered off somewhere. He had 
leave of absence from General Wilkinson, whom he left at Natchez. He 
looked well — much better than ever he did before. He was one of your 
officers that I thought could be depended on — never promised more than he 
intended, and always ready when ordered. I think him an honest fellow. 

In all that I have said, I have not made one complaint. I am deter- 
mined to make the best of what offers — rough or smooth — and say noth- 
ing; except mob government, I can't but dislike; I shall always hate 
disorder. How a man brought up in an army can join in the democratic 



LETTERS. 477 

hue and cry and be Jacobin, is the most astonisbing thing to me in the 

world ; and yet I am told there are many of our old officers such. It is 

wonderful. I will do my own duty punctually, let me be in what station 

I may ; must take thought how I place myself. I wish it was in my 

power to see you soon. You have my prayers, and Mrs. Denny joins me 

in our best and most affectionate respects to Mrs. H. and yourself. 

Yours, &c., 

E. Denny. 

General Harmab, near Philadelphia. 
